[Will, a veteran ranger in a Night's Watch patrol, has discovered the
mangled remains of several wildlings they were tracking]

Ser Waymar Royce: [their commander, a newcomer]  What do you expect?
                  They're savages; one lot steals a goat from another
                  lot and before you know it they're ripping each
                  other to pieces.
Will: I've never seen wildlings do a thing like this. I've never seen
      a thing like this in my  life !
Ser Waymar Royce: How close did you get?
Will: Close as any man would.
Gared: [another veteran in the patrol]  We should head back to the
       Wall.
Ser Waymar Royce: Do the dead frighten you?
Gared: Our orders were to track the wildlings. We tracked them. They
       won't trouble us no more.
Ser Waymar Royce: You don't think he'll ask us  how  they died? Get
                  back on your horse.
Will: Whatever did it to them could do it to us. They even killed the
      children!
Ser Waymar Royce: It's a good thing we're not children. You want to
                  run away south, run away. Of course, they will
                  behead you as a deserter, if I don't catch you
                  first. Get back on your horse, I won't say it again.

	"Game of Thrones: Winter is Coming [1.01], Season 1"
%
[Eddard Stark has beheaded a deserter from the Night's Watch]

Eddard Stark: You understand why I did it?
Bran Stark: Jon said he was a deserter.
Eddard Stark: But you understand why  I  had to kill him.
Bran Stark: Our way is the old way.
Eddard Stark: The man who passes the sentence should swing the sword.
Bran Stark: Is it true he saw the White Walkers?
Eddard Stark: The White Walkers have been gone for thousands of years.
Bran Stark: So he was lying?
Eddard Stark: A madman sees what he sees.

	"Game of Thrones: Winter is Coming [1.01], Season 1"
%
Robert Baratheon: Lord Eddard Stark, I would name you the Hand of the
                  King.
Eddard Stark: [kneels]  I'm not worthy of the honor.
Robert Baratheon: I'm not trying to honor you. I'm trying to get you
                  to run my kingdom while I can eat, drink and whore
                  my way to an early grave. Damn it, Ned, stand up.
                  You helped me win the Iron Throne, now help me keep
                  the damned thing.

	"Game of Thrones: Winter is Coming [1.01], Season 1"
%
Jon Snow: You're Tyrion Lannister? The Queen's brother?
Tyrion Lannister: My greatest accomplishment. And you, you're Ned
                  Stark's bastard, aren't you?
[Jon walks away]

Tyrion Lannister: Did I offend you? Sorry. You  are  the bastard,
                  though.
Jon Snow: Lord Eddard Stark is my father.
Tyrion Lannister: And Lady Stark is not your mother, making you … the
                  bastard. Let me give you some advice, bastard: never
                  forget what you are. The rest of the world will not.
                  Wear it like armor, and it can never be used to hurt
                  you.
Jon Snow: What the hell do you know about being a bastard?
Tyrion Lannister: All dwarfs are bastards in their father's eyes.

	"Game of Thrones: Winter is Coming [1.01], Season 1"
%
[Bran has just caught Queen Cersei having sex with her brother]

Cersei Lannister: He saw us!
Jaime Lannister: [to Bran]  It's all right, it's all right, it's all
                 right.
Cersei Lannister: He saw us!
Jaime Lannister: [to Cersei]  I heard you the first time.  [to Bran]
                 Quite the little climber, aren't you? How old are
                 you, boy?
Bran Stark: Ten.
Jaime Lannister: Ten?  [pause]  The things I do for love.  [pushes
                 Bran out of the window]

	"Game of Thrones: Winter is Coming [1.01], Season 1"
%
Magister Illyrio Mopatis: A Dothraki wedding without at least three
                          deaths is considered a dull affair.

	"Game of Thrones: Winter is Coming [1.01], Season 1"
%
Joffrey Baratheon: We ride for King's Landing today.
Tyrion Lannister: Before you go, you will call on Lord and Lady Stark
                  and offer your sympathies.
Joffrey Baratheon: What good will my sympathies do them?
Tyrion Lannister: None, but it is expected of you. Your absence has
                  already been noted.
Joffrey Baratheon: The boy means nothing to me, and I can't stand the
                   wailing of women.
Tyrion Lannister: [slaps Joffrey]  One word and I hit you again.
Joffrey Baratheon: I'm telling mother!
Tyrion Lannister: [slaps Joffrey]  Go, tell her! But first you will
                  get to Lord and Lady Stark. And you will fall on
                  your knees in front of them and tell them how very
                  sorry you are, that you are at their service and
                  that all your prayers are with them. Do you
                  understand?
Joffrey Baratheon: You can't –
Tyrion Lannister: [slaps Joffrey]  Do you understand?
[Joffery scurries away]

Sandor "The Hound" Clegane: The Prince will remember that, little
                            Lord.
Tyrion Lannister: I hope so. If he forgets, be a good dog and remind
                  him.

	"Game of Thrones: The Kingsroad [1.02], Season 1"
%
Jon Snow: [after giving Arya her sword]  First lesson: stick them with
          the pointy end.

	"Game of Thrones: The Kingsroad [1.02], Season 1"
%
Jon Snow: All the best swords have names, you know.
Arya Stark: Sansa can keep her sewing needles. I've got a Needle of my
            own.

	"Game of Thrones: The Kingsroad [1.02], Season 1"
%
Robert Baratheon: I swear, if I weren't your king, you'd have hit me
                  already.
Eddard Stark: The worst thing about your coronation, I'll never get to
              hit you again.

	"Game of Thrones: The Kingsroad [1.02], Season 1"
%
Eddard Stark: Daenerys Targaryen has wed some Dothraki horse lord.
              What of it? Should we send her a wedding gift?
Robert Baratheon: A knife, perhaps. A good, sharp one and a bold man
                  to wield it.
Eddard Stark: She's little more than a child.
Robert Baratheon: Soon enough, that child will spread her legs and
                  start breeding.
Eddard Stark: Tell me we're not speaking of this.
Robert Baratheon: [Enraged]  Oh, it's unspeakable to you? What her
                  father did to your family - that was unspeakable.
                  What Rhaegar Targaryen did to your sister - the
                  woman I loved. I'll  kill  every Targaryen I get my
                  hands on!

	"Game of Thrones: The Kingsroad [1.02], Season 1"
%
[In the throne room of the Red Keep]

Jaime Lannister: It must be strange for you, coming into this room. I
                 was standing right here when it happened. He was very
                 brave, your brother. Your father too. They didn't
                 deserve to die like that;  nobody  deserves to die
                 like that.
Eddard Stark: But you just stood there and watched.
Jaime Lannister: Five hundred men just stood there and watched. All
                 the great knights of the Seven Kingdoms, you think
                 anyone said a word, lifted a finger? No, Lord Stark.
                 Five hundred men and this room was silent as a  crypt
                 ...except for the screams, of course, and the Mad
                 King laughing. And later, when I watched the Mad King
                 die, I remembered him laughing as your father
                 burned...it felt like justice.
Eddark Stark: [disdainful]  Is that what you tell yourself at night?
              You're a servant of justice? That you were avenging my
              father when you shoved your sword in Aerys Targaryen's
              back?
Jaime Lannister: Tell me, if I'd stabbed the Mad King in the belly
                 instead of the back, would you admire me more?
Eddark Stark: You served him well. When serving was  safe .

	"Game of Thrones: Lord Snow [1.03], Season 1"
%
Petyr Baelish: We already owe Lord Tywin three million gold. What's
               another 80,000?
Eddard Stark: Are you telling me the crown is three million in debt?
Petyr Baelish: I'm telling you the crown is  six  million in debt.
Eddard Stark: How could you let this happen?!
Petyr Baelish: The Master of Coin finds the money, the King and the
               Hand spend it.
Eddard Stark: I will not believe Jon Arryn allowed Robert to bankrupt
              the Realm.
Grand Master Pycelle: Lord Arryn gave wise and prudent advice. But I
                      fear His Grace doesn't always listen.

	"Game of Thrones: Lord Snow [1.03], Season 1"
%
Old Nan: Don't listen to it. Crows are all liars. I know a story about
         a crow.
Bran: I hate your stories.
Old Nan: I know a story about a boy who hated stories. I could tell
         you about Sir Duncan the Tall; those were always your
         favorites.
Bran: Those aren't my favorites. My favorites were the scary ones.
Old Nan: Oh, my sweet summer child. What do you know about fear? Fear
         is for the winter when the snows fall a hundred feet deep.
         Fear is for the the long nights when the sun hides for  years
         , and children are born and live and die, all in darkness.
         That is the time for fear, my little lord; when the white
         walkers move through the woods. Thousands of years ago there
         came a night that lasted a generation. Kings froze to death
         in their castles, same as the shepherds in their huts, and
         women smothered their babies rather than see them starve, and
         wept and felt their tears  freeze  on their cheeks. So is
         this the sort of story that you like?  [watches as Bran nods]
         In that darkness the white walkers came for the first time.
         They swept through cities and kingdoms, riding their dead
         horses, hunting with their packs of pale spiders big as
         hounds...

	"Game of Thrones: Lord Snow [1.03], Season 1"
%
Benjen Stark: [angrily]  The Night's Watch is a joke to you, is it?!
              Is that what we are, Lannister? An army of jesters in
              black?!
Tyrion Lannister: You don't have enough men to be an army, and aside
                  from Yoren here, none of you are particularly funny.
Benjen Stark: I hope we've provided some good stories for you to tell
              when you're back in King's Landing. Something to think
              about while you're drinking your wine down there,
              enjoying the brothels; half the boys you've seen
              training will die north of the Wall. Might be a
              wildling's axe that gets them, might be sickness, might
              just be the cold. They die in pain, and they do it so
              plump little lords like you can enjoy their summer
              afternoons in peace and comfort.
Tyrion Lannister: [joking]  Do you think I'm plump? Listen,
                  Benjen,...may I call you Benjen?
Benjen Stark: Call me what you like.
Tyrion Lannister: I'm not sure what I've done to offend you; I have
                  great admiration for the Night's Watch. I have great
                  admiration for you as First Ranger-
Benjen Stark: [chuckles]  My brother once told me that nothing someone
              says before the word 'but' really counts.
Tyrion Lannister: But . I don't believe that giants and ghouls and
                  White Walkers are lurking beyond the Wall. I believe
                  the only difference between us and the wildlings is
                  that when that wall went up, our ancestors happened
                  to live on the right side of it.
Benjen Stark: You're right; the wildlings are no different from us. A
              little rougher maybe, but they're made of meat and bone;
              I know how to track them, and I know how to kill them.
              It's not the wildlings giving me sleepless nights.
              You've never been north of the Wall, so  don't  tell me
              what's out there.

	"Game of Thrones: Lord Snow [1.03], Season 1"
%
Maester Aemon: How many winters have you seen, Lord Tyrion?
Tyrion Lannister: Eight, no, nine.
Maester Aemon: All of them brief?
Tyrion Lannister: They say the winter of my birth was three years
                  long, Maester Aemon.
Maester Aemon: This summer has lasted nine, but already reports from
               the Citadel tell us the days grow shorter. The Starks
               are always right eventually - winter  is  coming. This
               one will be long, and dark things will come with it.
Commander Mormont: We've been capturing wildlings, more every month.
                   They're fleeing south; the ones who flee say
                   they've seen the White Walkers.
Tyrion Lannister: [dismissive]  Yes and the fishermen of Lannisport
                  say they see mermaids.
Commander Mormont: One of our own rangers swore he saw them kill his
                   companions. He swore it...right up to the moment
                   Ned Stark chopped his head off!
Maester Aemon: The Night's Watch is the only thing standing between
               the realm and what lies beyond, and it has become an
               army of undisciplined boys and tired old men. There are
               less than a thousand of us now; we can't man the other
               castles on the Wall. We can't properly patrol the
               wilderness. We've barely enough resources to keep our
               own lads armed and fed.
Commander Mormont: Your sister sits by the side of the King. Tell her
                   we need help.
Maester Aemon: And when winter  does  comes...gods help us all if
               we're not ready!

	"Game of Thrones: Lord Snow [1.03], Season 1"
%
Maester Luwin: The boy has lost the use of his legs.
Tyrion Lannister: What of it? With the right horse and saddle, even a
                  cripple can ride.
Bran Stark: I'm not a cripple.
Tyrion Lannister: Then I'm not a dwarf! My father will rejoice to hear
                  it.

	"Game of Thrones: Cripples, Bastards and Broken Things [1.04], Season 1"
%
Robb Stark: Is this some kind of trick? Why do you want to help him?
Tyrion Lannister: I have a tender spot in my heart for cripples,
                  bastards and broken things.

	"Game of Thrones: Cripples, Bastards and Broken Things [1.04], Season 1"
%
Jon Snow: You can't fight. You can't see. You're afraid of heights and
          almost everything else, probably. What are you doing here,
          Sam?
Samwell Tarly: On the morning of my eighteenth nameday, my father came
               to me. You're almost a man now, he said, but you're not
               worthy of my land and title. Tomorrow you're going to
               take the black, forsake all claims to your inheritance
               and start north. If you do not, he said, then we will
               have a hunt, and somewhere in these woods, your horse
               will stumble and you'll be thrown from your saddle to
               die. Or so I will tell your mother. Nothing would
               please me more.

	"Game of Thrones: Cripples, Bastards and Broken Things [1.04], Season 1"
%
Daenerys Targaryen: I am a Khaleesi of the Dothraki! I am the wife of
                    the great Khal and I carry his son inside me. The
                    next time you raise a hand to me will be the  last
                    time you have hands!

	"Game of Thrones: Cripples, Bastards and Broken Things [1.04], Season 1"
%
Ned Stark: Lord Baelish, perhaps I was wrong to distrust you.
Petyr Baelish: Distrusting me was the wisest thing you've done since
               you climbed off your horse.

	"Game of Thrones: Cripples, Bastards and Broken Things [1.04], Season 1"
%
[Having lost a tournament to Loras Tyrell, a furious Gregor Clegane
attacks him]

Sandor Clegane: Leave him be!  (He rushes to the aid of Loras, and
                defends him)
Robert Baratheon: [standing up]  STOP THIS MADNESS IN THE NAME OF YOUR
                  KING!  [Sandor kneels, but Gregor merely stalks off]
Loras Tyrell: I owe you my life, ser.
Sandor Clegane: I'm no "ser".

	"Game of Thrones: The Wolf and the Lion [1.05], Season 1"
%
Robert Baratheon: Backstabbing doesn't prepare you for a fight and
                  that's all the realm is now: backstabbing and
                  scheming and arse-licking and money-grubbing.
                  Sometimes I don't know what holds it together.
Cersei Lannister: Our marriage.  [both burst out laughing]
Robert Baratheon: So, here we sit, 17 years later, holding it all
                  together. Don't you get tired?
Cersei Lannister: Every day.
Robert Baratheon: How long can hate hold a thing together?
Cersei Lannister: Well, 17 years is quite a long time.

	"Game of Thrones: The Wolf and the Lion [1.05], Season 1"
%
Cersei Lannister: What was she [Lyanna Stark] like?
Robert Baratheon: [shocked]  You've never asked about her, not once.
                  Why now?
Cersei Lannister: At first, just saying her name, even in private,
                  felt like I was breathing life back into her. I
                  thought if I didn't talk about her, she'd just fade
                  away for you. When I realised that wasn't going to
                  happen, I refused to ask out of spite; I didn't want
                  to give you the satisfaction of thinking I cared to
                  ask. And eventually it became clear that my spite
                  didn't mean anything to you; as far as I could tell,
                  you actually enjoyed it!
Robert Baratheon: So why now?
Cersei Lannister: What harm could Lyanna Stark's ghost do to either of
                  us that we haven't done to each other a hundred
                  times over?
Robert Baratheon: [sadly]  You want to know the horrible truth? I
                  can't even remember what she looked like. I only
                  know she was the one thing I ever wanted. Someone
                  took her away from me, and seven kingdoms couldn't
                  fill the hole she left behind.

	"Game of Thrones: The Wolf and the Lion [1.05], Season 1"
%
[Eddard Stark has opposed Robert Baratheon's plan to assassinate the
Targaryens]

Robert Baratheon: You're my counsel. Counsel! Speak sense to this
                  "honorable" fool!
Varys: I understand your misgivings, my lord. Truly, I do. It is a
       terrible thing we must consider, a vile thing. Yet we who
       presume to rule must sometimes do vile things  for the good of
       the realm . Should the gods grant Daenerys a son, the realm
       will bleed.
Pycelle: I bear this girl no ill will, but should the Dothraki invade,
         how many innocents will die? How many towns will burn? Is it
         not wiser – kinder, even – that she should die now, so that
         tens of thousands might live?
Renly Baratheon: We should have had them both killed years ago!
Petyr Baelish: When you find yourselves in bed with an ugly woman –
               best close your eyes and get it over with.
[The others cringe at this crude picture]

Petyr Baelish: Cut her throat and be done with it!

	"Game of Thrones: The Wolf and the Lion [1.05], Season 1"
%
Lysa Arryn: [to her son, Robert]  He killed your father, he murdered
            the Hand of the King!
Tyrion Lannister: [sarcastically]  Oh, did I kill him too? I've been a
                  very  busy man.

	"Game of Thrones: The Wolf and the Lion [1.05], Season 1"
%
Tyrion Lannister: [calling out to his gaoler, Mord]  MORD!!!
                  TURNKEY!!!
Mord: [bursts into the sky cell, hitting Tyrion and driving him into a
      corner]  Dwarf man making noise!
Tyrion Lannister: [to his gaoler, Mord]  How would you like to be
                  rich?
Mord: [hits Tyrion]  Dwarf man  STILL  making noise!
Tyrion Lannister: M-my family has rich. They have  gold.  Lots of
                  gold. I'm prepared to give you  lots of gold.
Mord: [searches Tyrion]  No gold.  [hits him]
Tyrion Lannister: Well, I don't have it  here !
Mord: No gold!  [hits him again and leaves]  Fuck off.

	"Game of Thrones: A Golden Crown [1.06], Season 1"
%
Tyrion Lannister: About the gold-  [Mord hits Tyrion]
Mord: No gold!  No gold!
Tyrion Lannister: Listen to me, sometimes, possession, is an abstract
                  concept- [Mord hits him]  When they captured me,
                  they took my purse, but the gold is still mine!
Mord: Where?!
Tyrion Lannister: "Where?!" I don't know where, but- [Mord hits
                  Tyrion]  Free me!
Mord: You want free?  [gestures to the mile-long drop where his cell
      ends]  Go be free.
Tyrion Lannister: Have you ever heard the phrase "rich as a
                  Lannister"? Of course you have. You're a smart man.
                  You know who the Lannisters are.  I  am a Lannister.
                  Tyrion, son of Tywin. Of course, you've also heard
                  the phrase "a Lannister always pays his debts". If
                  you deliver a message to Lady Arryn for me, I will
                  be in your debt.
[Mord looks at Tyrion incredulously]

Tyrion Lannister: I will owe you gold. …  If  you deliver the message,
                  and I live, which I very much intend to do.
Mord: [suspicious]  What message?
Tyrion Lannister: [gets up]  Tell her I wish to confess my crimes.

	"Game of Thrones: A Golden Crown [1.06], Season 1"
%
[Bronn, fighting for Tyrion, has just slain Lysa Arryn's champion in a
trial by combat]

Lysa Arryn: [to Bronn]  You do not fight with honor!
Bronn: No, milady.  [gestures to his fallen foe]  He did.
Robin Arryn: Mom make the little man fly now?
Tyrion Lannister: Not this little man, this little man is going home.
                  [approaches Rodrik]  I believe you have something of
                  mine.
[Rodrik tosses Tyrion his purse; as Tyrion exits, he tosses it at
Mord, whom he earlier promised a reward]

Tyrion Lannister: A Lannister always pays his debts.

	"Game of Thrones: A Golden Crown [1.06], Season 1"
%
Robert Baratheon: Back in our day, you weren't a real man until you
                  fucked one girl from each of the Seven Kingdoms and
                  the Riverlands. We used to call it 'Making the
                  Eight'.
Renly Baratheon: [sarcastic]  Those were some lucky girls.
Robert Baratheon: You ever make the eight, Barristan?
Barristan Selmy: I don't believe so, Your Grace.
Robert Baratheon: [laughs]  Those were the days.
Renly Baratheon: Which days exactly? The ones where half of Westeros
                 fought the other half and millions died? Or before
                 that, when the Mad King slaughtered women and babies
                 because the voices in his head told him they deserved
                 it? Or way before that, when dragons burned whole
                 cities to the ground!
Robert Baratheon: Easy boy. You might be my brother, but you're
                  speaking to the King.
Renly Baratheon: I suppose it was all rather heroic, if you were drunk
                 enough and had some poor Riverlands whore to shove
                 your prick inside and "make the eight".

	"Game of Thrones: A Golden Crown [1.06], Season 1"
%
[Viserys is restrained by Drogo's bloodriders for threatening
Daenerys, since Drogo has not given him the crown he promised]

Jorah Mormont: Look away,  Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: No.
Viserys Targaryen: (terrified)  Dany, Dany tell them, make them, make
                   them. You can't, please.  [Daenerys remains silent]
                   DANY, PLEASE!
Khal Drogo: [walks up to Viserys with a pot of molten gold] A Crown
            for a King.
[He upends the pot onto Viserys' head, killing him]

Daenerys Targaryen: He was no dragon. Fire cannot kill a dragon.

	"Game of Thrones: A Golden Crown [1.06], Season 1"
%
Tywin Lannister: The lion does not concern himself with the opinions
                 of the sheep. [pause]  I suppose I should be grateful
                 your vanity got in the way of your recklessness.
                 [pause]  I'm giving you half of our forces-thirty
                 thousand men. You will bring them to Catelyn Stark's
                 girlhood home and remind her that Lannisters pay
                 their debts!
Jaime Lannister: I didn't know you put such a high value on my
                 brother's life.
Tywin Lannister: He's a Lannister. He might be the lowest of the
                 Lannisters, but he is one of us. And every day that
                 he remains a prisoner, the less our name commands
                 respect.
Jaime Lannister: So, the lion does concern himself with the opinions –
Tywin Lannister: It's not an opinion, it's a fact! If another house
                 can seize one of our own, and hold him captive with
                 impunity, it means we're no longer a house to be
                 feared! Your mother's dead, before long I'll be dead,
                 and you...and your brother and your sister and all of
                 her children. All of us dead, all of us rotting in
                 the ground. It's the family name that lives on. It's
                 all that lives on. Not your honor, not your personal
                 glory, family.
...

Tywin Lannister: You're blessed with abilities that few men possess.
                 You're blessed to belong to the most powerful family
                 in the Kingdoms, and you're still blessed with youth.
                 And what have you done with these blessings? You've
                 served as a glorified bodyguard for two kings, one a
                 madman, the other a drunk. The future of our family
                 will be determined in these next few months. We could
                 establish a dynasty that will last a thousand
                 years...or we could collapse into nothing, as the
                 Targaryens did. I need you to become the man you were
                 always meant to be. Not next year, not tomorrow...
                 now .

	"Game of Thrones: You Win or You Die [1.07], Season 1"
%
Eddard Stark: I know the truth Jon Arryn died for.
Cersei Lannister: Do you, Lord Stark? Is that why you call me here, to
                  pose me riddles?
Eddard Stark: [gesturing to the bruise on Cersei's cheek]  Has he done
              this before?
Cersei Lannister: Jaime would have killed him. My brother is worth a
                  thousand of your friend.
Eddard Stark: Your brother? Or your lover?
Cersei Lannister: The Targaryens wed brothers and sisters for three
                  hundred years to keep bloodlines pure. Jaime and I
                  are more than brother and sister; we shared a womb,
                  came into this world together – we  belong
                  together.
Eddard Stark: My son saw you with him.
Cersei Lannister: Do you love your children?
Eddard Stark: With all my heart.
Cersei Lannister: No more than I love mine.
Eddard Stark: And they're all Jaime's.
Cersei Lannister: [chuckles]  Thank the gods. In the rare event Robert
                  leaves his whores long enough to stumble drunken
                  into my bed, I finish him off in other ways. In the
                  morning, he doesn't remember.
Eddard Stark: You've always hated him!
Cersei Lannister: Hated him ?! I  worshipped  him! Every girl in the
                  Seven Kingdoms dreamed of him, but he was mine by
                  oath. And when I finally saw him on our wedding day
                  in the Sept of Baelor, lean and fierce and black-
                  bearded, it was the happiest moment of my life. And
                  that night, he crawled on top of me, stinking of
                  wine, and did what he did – what little he could do
                  … and whispered in my ear,  "Lyanna" . Your sister
                  was a corpse, I was a living girl, and he loved her
                  more than me!
Eddard Stark: When the king returns from his hunt, I will tell him the
              truth. You must be gone by then, you and your children;
              I won't have their blood on my hands. Go as far away as
              you can with as many men as you can, because wherever
              you go, Robert's wrath will follow you.
Cersei Lannister: And what of  my  wrath, Lord Stark? You should have
                  taken the realm for yourself. Jaime told me about
                  the day King's Landing fell. He was sitting on the
                  Iron Throne, and you made him give it up. All you
                  needed to do was climb the steps yourself … such a
                  sad mistake.
Eddard Stark: I've made many mistakes in my life, but  that  wasn't
              one of them.
Cersei Lannister: Oh, but it was. When you play the game of thrones,
                  you win or you die; there is no middle ground.

	"Game of Thrones: You Win or You Die [1.07], Season 1"
%
Renly Baratheon: Lord Stark, a moment...Alone, if you will?  [Eddard
                 dismisses his guards]  He [Robert] named you
                 Protector of the Realm?
Eddard Stark: He did.
Renly Baratheon: She won't care. Give me an hour, and I can put a
                 hundred swords at your command.
Eddard Stark: And what should I do with a hundred swords?
Renly Baratheon: Strike!  Tonight, while the castle sleeps! We must
                 get Joffrey away from his mother and into our
                 custody; Protector of the Realm or no, he who holds
                 the king holds the kingdom. Every moment you delay
                 gives Cersei another moment to prepare; by the time
                 Robert dies, it will be too late for the both of us!
Eddard Stark: And what about Stannis?
Renly Baratheon: [incredulous]  Saving the Seven Kingdoms from Cersei
                 and delivering them to Stannis?! You have odd notions
                 about protecting the realm!
Eddard Stark: Stannis is your older brother-
Renly Baratheon: This isn't about the bloody line of succession! That
                 didn't matter when you rebelled against the Mad King,
                 it shouldn't matter now! What's best for the
                 Kingdoms? What's best for the people we rule? We all
                 know what Stannis is; he inspires no love or loyalty.
                 He's not a king... I am .
Eddard Stark: Stannis is a commander. He's led men into war twice, he
              destroyed the Greyjoy fleet-
Renly Baratheon: Yes, he's a good soldier, everyone knows that; so was
                 Robert! Tell me something, do you still believe good
                 soldiers make good kings?
Eddard Stark: I will not dishonour Robert's last hours by shedding
              blood in his halls and dragging frightened children from
              their beds.

	"Game of Thrones: You Win or You Die [1.07], Season 1"
%
Khal Drogo: [translated from Dothraki]  And to my son, the stallion
            who will mount the world, I will also pledge a gift. I
            will give him the iron chair that his mother's father sat
            upon. I will give him Seven Kingdoms. I, Drogo, will do
            this. I will take my Khalasar west to where the world ends
            and ride wooden horses across the black salt water as no
            Khal has done before! I will kill the men in iron suits
            and tear down their stone houses! I will rape their women,
            take their children as slaves and bring their broken gods
            back to Vaes Dothrak! This, I vow, I, Drogo, son of
            Bharbo. I swear before the Mother of Mountains as the
            stars look down in witness! As the stars look down in
            witness!

	"Game of Thrones: You Win or You Die [1.07], Season 1"
%
Petyr Baelish: [after betraying Ned]  I did warn you not to trust me.

	"Game of Thrones: You Win or You Die [1.07], Season 1"
%
Ser Meryn Trant: Arya Stark, come with us. Your father wants to see
                 you.  [Arya starts to walk toward Trant, but Syrio
                 stops her]
Syrio Forel: And why is it that Lord Eddard is sending Lannister men
             in place of his own, I wonder?
Ser Meryn Trant: Mind your place,  dancing master . This is no concern
                 of yours.
Arya Stark: My father wouldn't send  you .  [picks up a wooden
            practice sword]  And I don't have to go with you if I
            don't want.
Ser Meryn Trant: [laughs]  Take her.
Syrio Forel: Are you men or snakes that you would threaten a child?
Lannister guard: Get out of my way, little man.
Syrio Forel: I am Syrio Forel...
Lannister guard: Foreign bastard.
[Syrio whacks the Lannister guard on the head with his wooden sword,
knocking him out]

Syrio Forel: And you will be speaking to me with more respect.
Ser Meryn Trant: Kill the Braavosi! Bring the girl.
Syrio Forel: Arya child, we are done with dancing for today. Run to
             your father.
[Syrio proceeds to beat up all four Lannister soldiers]

Ser Meryn Trant: [draws his sword]  Bloody oafs!
Syrio Forel: Begone, Arya.
Arya Stark: Come with me, Syrio.  Run.
Syrio Forel: The First Sword of Braavos does not run.
[Meryn Trant and Syrio fight briefly, then Trant snaps Syrio's sword
in half]

Syrio Forel: What do we say to the god of death?
Arya Stark: [shivering]  Not today.  [runs]

	"Game of Thrones: The Pointy End [1.08], Season 1"
%
Tyrion: What do you want from me, Bronn? Gold? Women? Golden women?
        Stick with me and you'll have them all, for as long as I'm
        around and not a moment longer. But you knew that; that  is
        why you took up arms so valiantly to defend my honour!
Bronn: Alright, but don't expect me to call upon your lordship
       whenever you take a shit. I'm not your toady, and I'm not your
       friend.
Tyrion: Though I would treasure your friendship, I'm mainly interested
        in your facility with murder. And if the day ever comes where
        you're tempted to sell me out, remember this: Whatever the
        price, I'll beat it. I like living.

	"Game of Thrones: The Pointy End [1.08], Season 1"
%
Shagga: How would you like to die, Tyrion son of Tywin?
Tyrion Lannister: In my own bed at the age of 80, with a bellyful of
                  wine and a girl's mouth around my cock!

	"Game of Thrones: The Pointy End [1.08], Season 1"
%
Drogo: Moon of my life, Mago says you have taken his spoils, a
       daughter of a lamb man who was his to mount. Tell me the truth
       of this.
Daenerys: Mago speaks the truth, my sun and stars. I have claimed many
          daughters this day so they cannot be mounted.
Drogo: This is the way of war. These women are slaves now to do with
       as we please.
Daenerys: It pleases me to keep them safe. If your riders would mount
          them, let them take them for wives.
Qotho: Does the horse mate with the lamb?
Daenerys: The dragon feeds on horse and lamb alike.
Mago: You are a foreigner. You do not command me.
Daenerys: I am Khaleesi. I do command you.
Drogo: [chuckles]  See how fierce she grows? That is my son inside
       her, the stallion that will mount the world, filling her with
       his fire. I will hear no more. Mago, find somewhere else to
       stick your cock.  [Mago spits in disgust and raises his sword]
Mago: A Khal who takes orders from a foreign whore is no khal at all!
[Drogo attacks Mago]

Drogo: I will not have your body burned. I will not give you that
       honor. The beetles will feed on your eyes. The worms will crawl
       through your lungs.  [dodges several blows]  The rain will fall
       on your rotting skin until nothing is left of you but bones.
Mago: First you have to kill me!  [attacks Drogo again]
Drogo: I already have!  [Drogo slices open Mago's throat, then shoves
       his hand in the wound and tears Mago's tongue out from its
       base]

	"Game of Thrones: The Pointy End [1.08], Season 1"
%
Bran: What did you mean about hearing the gods?
Osha: You asked them; they're answering you. Shhh. Open your ears.
Bran: That's only the wind.
Osha: Who do you think sends the winds but the gods? They see you,
      boy, they hear you. Your brother will get no help from them
      where he's going. The old gods have no power in the south. The
      weirwoods there were all cut down a long time ago. How can they
      watch when they have no eyes?
[...]

Bran: Are there really giants beyond the wall?
Osha: Giants and worse than giants. I tried telling your brother he's
      marching the wrong way. All these swords, they should be going
      the north, boy; north, not south. The cold winds are rising.

	"Game of Thrones: The Pointy End [1.08], Season 1"
%
Eddard Stark: Can you free me from this pit?
Varys: I  could . But  will  I? No. As I said, I'm no hero.
Eddard Stark: What do you want? Tell me, no stories, no riddles. Tell
              me, what do you want?
Varys: Peace . Did you know that your son is marching south with an
       army of northmen? Loyal lad, fighting for his father's freedom.
Eddard Stark: Robb? He's just a boy.
Varys: Boys have been conquerers before. But the man giving Cersei
       sleepless nights is the king's...the  late  king's brother.
       Lord Stannis has the best claim to the throne; he's a proven
       battle commander and he is utterly without mercy.
Eddard Stark: Stannis Baratheon is Robert's  true  heir. The throne is
              his by rights!
Varys: [tuts]  Sansa pleaded so sweetly for your life, it would be a
       shame to throw it away. Cersei is no fool. She knows a tame
       wolf is more use to her than a dead one.
Eddard Stark: You want me to serve the woman who murdered my king, who
              butchered my men, who crippled my son?!
Varys: I want you to serve  the realm!  Tell the Queen you will
       confess your vile treason, tell your son to lay down his sword
       and proclaim Joffrey as the true heir! Cersei knows you as a
       man of honour; if you give her the peace she needs, and promise
       to carry her secret to your grave, I believe she will allow you
       to take the black and live out your days on the Wall, with your
       brother and your bastard son.
Eddard Stark: [laughes]  You think my life is some precious thing to
              me? That I would trade my honour for a few more years
              of...of what?! You grew up with actors; you learned
              their craft and you learnt it well. But I grew up with
              soldiers. I learned how to die a long time ago.
Varys: Pity. Such a pity.  [Varys moves to leave, but turns back for
       one last word]  What of your daughter's life, my lord? Is  that
       a precious thing to you?  [Ned is visibly given pause by the
       remark]

	"Game of Thrones: Baelor [1.09], Season 1"
%
Tywin Lannister: [on Robb Stark]  The boy may lack experience, but he
                 does have a certain provincial courage.  [glares at
                 Tyrion as he arrives to the briefing, late]
Tyrion Lannister: Oh, do continue.
Tywin Lannister: I do hope your savages are going to be of some use,
                 otherwise we wasted good steel on them.
Kevan Lannister: The great hairy one insisted he must have two battle-
                 axes, heavy black steel, double-sided.
Tyrion Lannister: Shagga likes axes.
Tywin Lannister: When the battle commences, you and your wildlings
                 will be in the vanguard.
Tyrion Lannister: The vanguard? Me and the tribesmen, on the front
                  lines?
Addam Marband: They do seem rather ferocious.
Tyrion Lannister: Ferocious? Last night a Moon Brother stabbed a Stone
                  Crow over a sausage. Three Stone Crows seized the
                  Moon Brother and opened his throat. Bronn managed to
                  keep Shagga from chopping off the dead man's cock,
                  which was fortunate, but even still Ulf is demanding
                  blood money, which Shagga and Gunter refuse to pay-
Tywin Lannister: When soldiers lack discipline, the fault lies with
                 their commander.
Tyrion Lannister: Surely there are ways to have me killed that would
                  be less detrimental to the war effort!
Tywin Lannister: There'll be no more discussion on the matter.
Tyrion Lannister: [Pushes aside his plate]  It appears I'm not hungry
                  after all.

	"Game of Thrones: Baelor [1.09], Season 1"
%
Ser Jorah Mormont: [sees an infected and incoherent Khal Drogo]
                   Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: Come. He's very strong. No one understands how
                    strong he is.
Ser Jorah Mormont: [inspects the wound]  He will die tonight,
                   Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: He can't. He can't. I won't let him.
Ser Jorah Mormont: Even a queen doesn't have that power. We must go
                   quickly. I've heard there's a good port in Asshai.
Daenerys Targaryen: I won't leave him.
Ser Jorah Mormont: He's already gone, Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: Even – even if he dies, why would I run? I am
                    Khaleesi, and my son will be Khal after Drogo!
Ser Jorah Mormont: This isn't Westeros, where men honor blood. Here
                   they only honor strength. There will be fighting
                   after Drogo dies. Whoever wins that fight will be
                   the new Khal. He won't want any rivals. Your boy
                   will be plucked from your breast and given to the
                   dogs.
Daenerys Targaryen: I  won't  leave him.

	"Game of Thrones: Baelor [1.09], Season 1"
%
[Robb Stark returns victorious to Catelyn from the Whispering Wood,
having captured Jaime Lannister.]

Robb Stark: By the time they knew what was happening, it had already
            happened.
Jaime Lannister: Lady Stark, I'd offer you my sword, but, I seem to
                 have lost it.
Catelyn Stark: It is not your sword I want. Give me my daughters back,
               give me my husband.
Jaime Lannister: I've lost them too, I'm afraid.
Theon Greyjoy: Kill him Robb, send his head back to his father. He cut
               down ten of our men.
Robb Stark: He's more use to us alive than dead.
Catelyn Stark: Take him away and put him in irons.
Jaime Lannister: We could end this war right now boy, save thousands
                 of lives. I fight for the Lannisters, you fight for
                 the Starks. Swords, knives, teeth, nails; choose your
                 weapon, and we can end this.
Robb Stark: If we did it your way, Kingslayer, you'd win.  (Jaime
            grins)  We're not doing it your way.
Jon Umber: (leads Jaime away)  Come on, pretty man!
Robb Stark: I sent 2,000 men to their graves today.
Theon Greyjoy: The bards will sing songs of their sacrifice.
Robb Stark: Aye, but the dead won't hear them.  [turns to address his
            army]  One victory does not make us conquerers. Did we
            free my father? Did we free my sisters from the Queen? Did
            we free the North from those who'd have us on our knees?
            This war is far from over.

	"Game of Thrones: Baelor [1.09], Season 1"
%
Aemon Targaryen: The gods were cruel when they saw fit to test my vow.
                 They waited until I was old. What could I do when the
                 ravens brought the news from the South? The ruin of
                 my house. The death of my family. I was helpless,
                 blind, frail, but when I heard they had killed my
                 brother's son, and his poor son, and the  children .
                 Even the little children!
Jon Snow: Who are you?
Aemon Targaryen: My father was Maekar, the first of his name. My
                 brother Aegon reigned after him, when I had refused
                 the throne, and his son...was Aerys...whom they
                 called "The Mad King."
Jon Snow: You're Aemon Targaryen.
Aemon Targaryen: I am a Maester of the Citadel, bound in service to
                 Castle Black and the Night's Watch. I will not tell
                 you to stay or go. You must make that choice yourself
                 and live with it the rest of your days, as I have.

	"Game of Thrones: Baelor [1.09], Season 1"
%
[Catelyn and Robb Stark have just learned of Ned's death]

Robb Stark: [half sobbing]  I'll kill them all. Every one of them.
            I'll kill them  all .
Catelyn Stark: My boy, they have your sisters. We have to get the
               girls back...and then we will kill them  all .

	"Game of Thrones: Fire and Blood [1.10], Season 1"
%
Daenerys Targaryen: [furious]  You  knew  what I was buying, and you
                    knew the price!
Mirri Maz Duur: [unrepentant]  It was wrong of them to burn my temple.
                It angered the Great Shepherd...
Daenerys Targaryen: This is not God's work. My child was innocent!
Mirri Maz Duur: Innocent?  He would have been the stallion who mounts
                the world. Now he will burn no cities, now his
                Khalasar will trample no nations into dust.
Daenerys Targaryen: I spoke for you. I  saved  you!
Mirri Maz Duur: [scoffs]  Saved me? Three of those riders had already
                raped me before you "saved" me, girl. I saw my God's
                house burn. There where I had healed men and women,
                beyond counting. In the streets, I saw piles of heads.
                The head of a baker, who bakes my bread. A head of a
                little boy that I cured of fever just three moons
                past. So, tell me again exactly what it was that you
                saved?
Daenerys Targaryen: Your life!
Mirri Maz Duur: Why don't you take a look at your Khal? Then you will
                see exactly what life is worth, when all the rest has
                gone.

	"Game of Thrones: Fire and Blood [1.10], Season 1"
%
[The Lannisters are stymied by Robb Stark's recent victories, and
Jamie Lannister has been captured]

Tywin Lannister: They have my son.
Tyrion Lannister: The Stark boy appears to be less green than we'd
                  hoped.
Harys Swift: I'm told his wolf killed a dozen men and as many horses!
Addam Marband: Is it true about Stannis and Renly?
Kevan Lannister: Both Baratheon brothers have taken up against us.
                 Jaime captured, his armies scattered...it's a
                 catastrophe. Perhaps we should sue for peace.
Tyrion Lannister: [knocks his glass to the floor, shattering it]
                  There's your peace. Joffrey saw to that when he
                  decided to remove Ned Stark's head. You'll have an
                  easier time drinking out of that cup than you will
                  bringing Robb Stark to the table now. He's winning,
                  in case you hadn't noticed.
Kevan Lannister: I'm told we still have his sisters...
Harys Swift: The first order of business is ransoming Ser Jaime!
Addam Marband: No truces, we can't afford to look weak. We should
               march on them at once!
Kevan Lannister: First, we must return to Casterly Rock and raise-
[The Lannister lords begin arguing about what to do next]

Tywin Lannister: THEY HAVE  MY SON!   [All fall silent]  Get out, all
                 of you.  [to Tyrion]  Not you.  [Tyrion takes a seat]
                 You were right about Eddard Stark; if he were alive,
                 we could've used him to broker a peace with
                 Winterfell and Riverrun, which would have given us
                 more time to deal with Robert's brothers, but now?
                 Madness, madness and stupidity!  [pause]  I always
                 thought you were a stunted fool. Perhaps I was wrong.
Tyrion Lannister: Half  wrong. I'm new to strategy, but unless we want
                  to be surrounded by three armies, it appears we
                  can't stay here.
Tywin Lannister: No one will stay here. Ser Gregor will head out with
                 five hundred riders and set the riverlands on fire
                 from Gods' Eye to the Red Fork. The rest of us will
                 regroup at Harrenhal, and you will go to King's
                 Landing.
Tyrion Lannister: And do  what ?!
Tywin Lannister: Rule . You will serve as Hand of the King in my
                 stead; you'll bring that boy-king to heel and his
                 mother too, if needs be. And if you get so much as a
                 whiff of treason from any of the rest- Baelish,
                 Varys, Pycelle-
Tyrion Lannister: Heads, spikes, walls. Why not my uncle? Why not
                  anyone ?! Why me?
Tywin Lannister: You're my son.

	"Game of Thrones: Fire and Blood [1.10], Season 1"
%
Jonos Bracken: The proper course is clear; pledge fealty to King Renly
               and move south to join our forces with his.
Robb Stark: Renly is not the king.
Galbart Glover: You cannot mean to hold to Joffrey, my lord. He put
                your father to death!
Robb Stark: That doesn't make Renly king. He's Robert's  younger
            brother. Now Bran cannot be Lord of Winterfell before me,
            Renly cannot be king before Stannis.
Galbart Glover: Do you mean to declare us with Stannis?
Lord Karstark: Renly is not right!  [The Stark and Tully bannermen
               begin to argue]
Greatjon Umber: My lords. MY LORDS!  [all fall silent]  Here's what I
                say to these two kings.  [spits]  Renly Baratheon is
                nothing  to me, nor Stannis neither. Why should they
                rule over me and mine from some flowery seat in the
                south? What do they know of the Wall or the Wolfswood?
                Even their gods are wrong. Why shouldn't we rule
                ourselves again? It was the dragons we bowed to and
                now the dragons are dead.  [draws his sword and points
                it to Robb]  There sits the only King I mean to bend
                my knee to. The King in the North!  [kneels]
Lord Karstark: I'll have peace on those terms. They can keep their red
               castle, and their iron chair too.  [draws his sword and
               kneels]  The King in the North.
Theon Greyjoy: Am I your brother, now and always?
Robb Stark: Now and always.
Theon Greyjoy: [draws his sword and kneels]  My sword is yours, in
               victory and defeat, from this day until my last day.
Greatjon Umber: The King in the North!
Stark and Tully bannermen: The King in the North!  [all drawing
                           swords]   The King in the North!   THE KING
                           IN THE NORTH!

	"Game of Thrones: Fire and Blood [1.10], Season 1"
%
Jeor Mormont: (after telling Jon about several disturbing reports from
              Beyond-The-Wall)  Do you think your brother's war is
              more important than ours?
Jon Snow: No.
Jeor Mormont: When dead men and worse come hunting for us in the
              night, you think it matters who sits on the Iron Throne?
Jon Snow: No.
Jeor Mormont: Good. Because I want you and your wolf with us when we
              ride out beyond the Wall tomorrow.
Jon Snow: Beyond the Wall?
Jeor Mormont: I'll not sit meekly by and wait for the snows. I mean to
              find out what's happening. The Night's Watch will ride
              in force, against the Wildlings, the White Walkers and
              whatever else is out there. And we will find Benjen
              Stark, alive or dead. I will command them myself, so
              I'll only ask you once, Lord Snow: are you a brother of
              the Night's Watch, or a bastard boy who wants to play at
              war?

	"Game of Thrones: Fire and Blood [1.10], Season 1"
%
[Tyrion arrives at Joffrey's tournament, accompanied by Bronn and a
number of hill tribesmen]

Tyrion Lannister: Beloved nephew! We looked for you on the
                  battlefield, but you were  nowhere  to be found!
Joffrey Baratheon: [caught offguard]  I...I've been here, ruling the
                   kingdoms!
Tyrion Lannister: [mocking]  And what a  fine  job you've done!
                  [turns to his niece Myrcella]  Look at you, more
                  beautiful than ever!  [to his nephew Tommen]  And
                  you! You're going to be bigger than the Hound...but
                  much better looking!  [indicates the Hound to Bronn]
                  This one doesn't like me.
Bronn: I can't imagine why.
Joffrey Baratheon: We heard you were dead.
Myrcella Baratheon: I'm glad you're not dead.
Tyrion Lannister: Me too, dear. Death is so boring, especially now
                  with so much excitement in the world.  [turns to
                  Sansa]  My lady, I'm sorry for your loss.
Joffrey Baratheon: [outraged] Her loss?!  Her father was a confessed
                   traitor!
Tyrion Lannister: [curtly]  But still her father. Surely having so
                  recently lost your own beloved father, you can
                  sympathise!

	"Game of Thrones: The North Remembers [2.01], Season 2"
%
[Following Tyrion's arrival on the Small Council]

Cersei Lannister: I would like to know how you tricked Father into
                  this!
Tyrion Lannister: If I were capable of tricking Father, I'd be Emperor
                  of the world by now. You brought this on yourself.
Cersei Lannister: I've done nothing!
Tyrion Lannister: Quite right, you did  nothing  when your son called
                  for Ned Stark's head! Now the entire North has risen
                  up against us!
Cersei Lannister: I tried to stop it!
Tyrion Lannister: Did you? You failed. That bit of theatre will haunt
                  our family for a generation.
Cersei Lannister: [dismissive]  Robb Stark is a child.
Tyrion Lannister: Who's won every battle he's fought! Do you
                  understand we're losing the war?!
Cersei Lannister: What do  you  know about warfare?
Tyrion Lannister: Nothing. But I know people, and I know that our
                  enemies hate each other almost as much as they hate
                  us.  [pause]
Cersei Lannister: Joffrey is King.
Tyrion Lannister: Joffrey is King.
Cersei Lannister: You are here to advise him.
Tyrion Lannister: Only here to advise him. And if the King listens to
                  what I say, the King might just get his uncle Jaime
                  back.
Cersei Lannister: How?
Tyrion Lannister: You love your children. It’s your one redeeming
                  quality. That and your cheekbones. The Starks love
                  their children as well, and we have two of them.
Cersei Lannister: One.
Tyrion Lannister: One ?!
Cersei Lannister: Arya, that little animal, she disappeared.
Tyrion Lannister: Disappeared? What, in a puff of smoke? We had three
                  Starks to trade. You chopped one’s head off and let
                  another escape. Father would be furious. Must be odd
                  for you, to be the disappointing child.

	"Game of Thrones: The North Remembers [2.01], Season 2"
%
[Stannis and his council are writing a declaration]

Matthos Seaworth: And I declare on the honour of my House that my
                  beloved brother Robert left-
Stannis Baratheon: He wasn't my beloved brother. I didn't love him. He
                   didn't love me.
Davos Seaworth: A harmless courtesy, Your Grace.
Stannis Baratheon: A lie. Take it out.
Matthos Seaworth: That my brother Robert left no trueborn heirs, the
                  boy Joffrey, the boy Tommen and the girl Myrcella
                  being born of incest between Cersei Lannister and
                  her brother Jaime Lannnister. By right of birth-
Stannis Baratheon: Jaime Lannister, the Kingslayer. Call him what he
                   is.
Matthos Seaworth: And her brother Jaime Lannister, the Kingslayer. By
                  right of birth and blood, I do this day lay claim-
Stannis Baratheon: Make it  Ser  Jaime Lannister the Kingslayer.
                   Whatever else he is, the man's still a knight.
Matthos Seaworth: Ser Jaime Lannister the Kingslayer. By right of
                  birth and blood, I do this day lay claim to the Iron
                  Throne of Westeros. Let all true men declare their
                  loyalty.
Stannis Baratheon: When Eddard Stark learnt the truth, he told only
                   me. I'll not make the same mistake. Send copies of
                   that letter to every corner of the realm, from the
                   Arbor to the Wall. The time has come to choose. Let
                   no man claim ignorance as an excuse.
Davos Seaworth: Your Grace, the Lannisters are the true enemy. If, for
                the time being you could make peace with your brother-
Stannis Baratheon: I'll not make peace with Renly while he calls
                   himself king.
Davos Seaworth: But many have already declared for him. Mace Tyrell,
                Randyll Tarly...
Melisandre: Stannis does not need to beg this lord or that lord for
            support, the Lord of Light stands behind him.
Davos Seaworth: And how many ships has the Lord of Light got in his
                fleet?
Melisandre: He has no need for ships.
Davos Seaworth: I'm sure he doesn't, but we do if we're going to war.
                If not Renly Your Grace, join forces with Robb Stark.
Stannis Baratheon: Who'd steal the northern half of my kingdom. I've
                   always served thieves according to their deserts,
                   as you well know Ser Davos. Joffrey, Renly, Robb
                   Stark, they're all thieves. They'll bend the knee
                   or I'll destroy them.

	"Game of Thrones: The North Remembers [2.01], Season 2"
%
Cersei Lannister: I heard a song once, about a boy of modest means,
                  found his way in the home of a very prominent
                  family. He loved the eldest daughter. Sadly, she had
                  eyes for another.
Petyr Baelish: When boys and girls live in the same home, awkward
               situations can arise. Sometimes, I've heard, even
               brothers and sisters develop certain affections. And
               when those affections become common knowledge, well
               that  is an awkward situation indeed, especially in a
               prominent family. Prominent families often forget a
               simple truth I found.
Cersei Lannister: And which truth is that?
Petyr Baelish: Knowledge is power.
[ Cersei pauses a moment ]

Cersei Lannister: [ to her guards ] Cut his throat. [ her guards move
                  to do so ]
Cersei Lannister: No, wait. [ chuckles ] I've changed my mind. Let him
                  go. [ her guards do so ] Step back three paces. [
                  they obey ]. Turn around. [ they obey ] Close your
                  eyes. [ they obey ].
Cersei Lannister: [ steps up to Petyr ]  Power  is power.

	"Game of Thrones: The North Remembers [2.01], Season 2"
%
Robb Stark: Stannis Baratheon sent ravens to all the High Lords of
            Westeros. King Joffrey Baratheon is neither a true King,
            nor a true Baratheon. He's your bastard son.
Jaime Lannister: If that's true, Stannis is the rightful King. How
                 convenient for him.
Robb Stark: My father learned the truth. That's why you had him
            executed.
Jaime Lannister: I was your prisoner when Ned Stark lost his head.
Robb Stark: Your son killed him so the world wouldn't learn who
            fathered him and you... you pushed my brother from a
            window because he saw you with the Queen.
Jaime Lannister: You have proof? You want to trade gossip like a
                 couple of fishwives?
Robb Stark: I'm sending one of your counsins down the King's Landing
            with my peace terms.
Jaime Lannister: You think my father's going to negotiate with you?
                 You don't know him very well.
Robb Stark: But he's starting to know me.
Jaime Lannister: Three victories don't make you a conqueror.
Robb Stark: It's better than three defeats.

	"Game of Thrones: The North Remembers [2.01], Season 2"
%
Robb Stark: [speaking to Alton Lannister, a Lannister emissary]  I
            offer your cousins peace, if they meet my terms. First,
            your family must release my sisters. Second, my father's
            bones must be returned to us, so that he may rest beside
            his brother and sister in the crypts beneath Winterfell.
            And the remains of all those who died in his service must
            be returned also, that their families can honour them with
            proper funerals.
Alton Lannister: An honourable request, your Grace.
Robb Stark: Third, Joffrey and the Queen Regent must renounce all
            claim to dominion of the north. From this time to the end
            of time, we are a free and independent kingdom.
Northern Lords: The King in the North!
Robb Stark: Neither Joffrey nor any of his men shall ever set foot in
            our lands again. If he disregards this command, he shall
            suffer the same fate as my father...only I won't need a
            servant to do my beheading for me!
Alton Lannister: [stammering]  Your Grace...these are...
Robb Stark: These are my terms! If the Queen Regent and her son meet
            them, I'll give them peace. If not, I will litter the
            south with Lannister dead!
Alton Lannister: King Joffrey is a Baratheon, Your Grace.
Robb Stark: Is he ?

	"Game of Thrones: The North Remembers [2.01], Season 2"
%
Tyrion Lannister: [barring Varys' way out]  I don't like threats.
Varys: [feigning ignorance]  Who threatened you?
Tyrion Lannister: I'm not Ned Stark, I understand the way this game is
                  played.
Varys: Ned Stark was a man of honour-
Tyrion Lannister: And I am not. Threaten me again and I'll have you
                  thrown into the sea!
Varys: [now barring Tyrion's way out]  You might be disappointed in
       the results. The storms come and go, the big fish eat the
       little fish and I keep on paddling.

	"Game of Thrones: The Night Lands [2.02], Season 2"
%
[Davos tries to convince the pirate Salladhor Saan to join Stannis'
cause]

Davos Seaworth: Come with me and plunder the greatest city in
                Westeros. You'll be the richest man in Lys and the
                most famous. They'll be singing songs about you as
                long as men have voices to sing.
Salladhor Saan: Sallador Saan is a good name for songs.
Davos Seaworth: It is.
Sallador Saan: One thing; I want the Queen.
Davos Seaworth: The Queen?
Salladhor Saan: Cersei. I want her. I'll sail with your fleet, all 30
                of my ships, and if we don't drown at the bottom of
                Blackwater Bay, I'll fuck this blond queen and I'll
                fuck her well.
Mathos Seaworth: This war isn't about you. We're not attacking King's
                 Landing so that you can rape the Queen!
Salladhor Saan: I'm not going to rape her, I'm going to  fuck  her.
Mathos Seaworth: As if she would just let you.
Salladhor Saan: You don't know how persuasive I am. I never tried to
                fuck you.
Matthos Seaworth: Stannis is the rightful King and the Lord of Light.
Salladhor Saan: I've been all over the world, my boy, and everywhere I
                go people tell me about the  true god . They all think
                they found the right one. The one﻿ true God is what's
                between a woman's legs, and better yet a Queen's legs.
                [to Davos]  I never thought you'd have a true believer
                for a son.
Davos Seaworth: Ah, he's young yet. I promise you the gold. I promise
                you the glory. I cannot promise you the Queen.
Salladhor Saan: You believe your king can win?
Davos Seaworth: He is the one, true king.
Salladhor Saan: You Westerosi are funny people. A man chops off your
                fingers and you fall in love with him. I'll sail with
                you, Davos Seaworth. You're the most honest smuggler I
                ever met. Make me rich.
Davos Seaworth: Get me to the gates of King's Landing and I will.

	"Game of Thrones: The Night Lands [2.02], Season 2"
%
Tyrion Lannister: [quoting Jeor Mormont]  The cold winds are rising,
                  and the dead rise with them.

	"Game of Thrones: The Night Lands [2.02], Season 2"
%
(One of Daenerys's bloodriders has just returned, beheaded)

Ser Jorah Mormont: You have no need to see this.
Daenerys Targaryen: He is blood of my blood. Who did this?
Ser Jorah Mormont: Khal Pono, perhaps. Khal Jhaqo. They don't like the
                   idea of a woman leading a khalasar.
Daenerys Targaryen: They will like it far less when I am done with
                    them.

	"Game of Thrones: The Night Lands [2.02], Season 2"
%
Tyrion Lannister: Tell me, when your men slaughtered Ned Stark's men
                  in the throne room, did you give the order?
Lord Janos Slynt: I did, and I would again. The man was a traitor, he
                  tried to buy my loyalty!
Tyrion Lannister: The fool...he had no idea you were already bought!
Lord Janos Slynt: [angry]  Are you drunk?! I'll not have my honour
                  questioned by an imp!
Tyrion Lannister: I'm not questioning your honour, Lord Janos...I'm
                  denying its existence!

	"Game of Thrones: The Night Lands [2.02], Season 2"
%
Cersei Lannister: Lord Janos Slynt was Commander of the City Watch.
                  You had no right to exile him-!
Tyrion Lannister: I have  every  right! I am the King's Hand!
Cersei Lannister: You're serving as the King's Hand until Father gets
                  here. I am the Queen Regent!
Tyrion Lannister: Listen to me,  Queen Regent , you're losing the
                  people. Do you hear me?!
Cersei Lannister: [sneers]  The people? You think I care?!
Tyrion Lannister: You might find it  difficult  to rule over millions
                  who want you dead. Half this city will starve when
                  winter comes, the other half will plot to overthrow
                  you...and your gold-plated thugs just gave them
                  their rallying cry; "The Queen slaughters babies!"
                  [Cersei remains silent]  You don't even have the
                  decency to deny it!  [realises]  It wasn't you who
                  gave the order, was it? Joffrey didn't even tell
                  you?  [Another uncomfortable pause] Did  he tell
                  you? I imagine that would be even worse.
Cersei Lannister: He did what needed to be done! You want to be Hand
                  of the King?! You want to rule?! This is what ruling
                  is ; lying on a bed of weeds, ripping them out by
                  the root, one by one, before they strangle you in
                  your sleep!
Tyrion Lannister: I'm no king, but I think there's more to ruling than
                  that.
Cersei Lannister: [furious]  I DON'T CARE WHAT  YOU  THINK! You've
                  never taken it seriously; you haven't, Jaime hasn't.
                  It's all fallen on me.
Tyrion Lannister: As has Jaime repeatedly, according to Stannis
                  Baratheon.  [A pause, and then Cersei giggles]
Cersei Lannister: You're funny. You've always been funny...but none of
                  your jokes will ever match the first one, will they?
                  Do you remember, back when you ripped my mother open
                  on your way out of her and she bled to death?
Tyrion Lannister: [angry and hurt]  She was  my  mother too.
Cersei Lannister: Mother gone, for the sake of you. There's no bigger
                  joke in the world than that.

	"Game of Thrones: The Night Lands [2.02], Season 2"
%
Bran: Every night it's the same: I'm walking, running, but I'm not me.
      I'm running through the Godswood, sniffing the dirt, tasting
      blood in my mouth when I've made a fresh kill, howling. Old Nan
      used to tell me stories about magical people who could live
      inside stags, birds, wolves.
Maester Luwin: That's exactly what they were, Bran: stories.
Bran: So she was lying? They don't exist?
Maester Luwin: Well, they may have done, but they're gone from the
               world along with much else. These are dreams, Bran,
               nothing more.
Bran: No. My dreams are different. Mine are true. I dreamt of my
      father dying and Rickon had the same dream.
Maester Luwin: What about all the dreams you had that  didn't  come
               true?  [removes a link from his chain]  This link is
               made of Valyrian steel. Only one Maester in a hundred
               wears it on his chain. It signifies that I have studied
               the higher mysteries, and all who study these mysteries
               try their hand at spells. I was not different. I was
               young and what boy doesn't secretly wish for special
               powers to lift him out of his dull life into a special
               one, but in the end, for all of my efforts, I got no
               more out of it than a thousand boys before me. Come on.
               [tucks Bran back to bed]  Maybe magic once was a mighty
               force in the world, but not anymore; the dragons are
               gone, the giants are dead, and the children of the
               forest forgotten.

	"Game of Thrones: What Is Dead May Never Die [2.03], Season 2"
%
Loras Tyrell: Has your son marched against Tywin Lannister yet?
Catelyn Stark: I do not sit on my son's war councils, and if I did, I
               would not share his strategies with you.
Loras Tyrell: If Robb Stark wants a pact with us, he should come
              himself, not hide behind his mother's skirts!
Catelyn Stark: My son is fighting a war, not  playing  at one!

	"Game of Thrones: What Is Dead May Never Die [2.03], Season 2"
%
Renly Baratheon: I have a hundred thousand men at my command, all the
                 might of the Stormlands and the Reach.
Catelyn Stark: And all of them young and bold like your Knight of
               Flowers. It's a game to you, isn't it? I pity them.
Renly Baratheon: Why?
Catelyn Stark: Because it won't last. Because they are the knights of
               summer and winter is coming.

	"Game of Thrones: What Is Dead May Never Die [2.03], Season 2"
%
Balon Greyjoy: What are our words?  [Theon hesitates]   Our words?
Theon Greyjoy: "We Do Not Sow"
Balon Greyjoy: "We Do Not Sow". We are Ironborn. We're not subjects,
               we're not slaves. We do not plow the fields or toil in
               the mines. We take what is ours. Your time with the
               wolves has made you weak.
Theon Greyjoy: You act as if I volunteered to go. You gave me away if
               you remember. The day you bend the knee to Robert
               Baratheon. After he crushed you. Did you take what was
               yours then? [Balon slaps Theon]  You gave me away! Your
               boy! Your  last boy ! You gave me away like I was some
               dog you didn't want anymore. And now you curse me
               because I've come home.

	"Game of Thrones: What Is Dead May Never Die [2.03], Season 2"
%
(Tyrion, Bronn and Timmet barge into Pycelle's chambers)

Grand Maestar Pycelle: What is the meaning of this?!  [Bronn drags
                       Pycelle to his feet]  No! No, please!
Tyrion Lannister: You disappoint me, Grand Maester.
Grand Maester Pycelle: I am your loyal servant.
Tyrion Lannister: So loyal that you told the queen about my plans to
                  send Myrcella to Dorne.
Grand Maester Pycelle: No, never! It's a falsehood, I swear it. It
                       wasn't me.  (smiles)  Ah, Varys! It was Varys,
                       the Spider-
Tyrion Lannister: See, I told Varys that I was giving the princess to
                  the Greyjoys. I told Littlefinger that I planned to
                  wed her to Robin Arryn. I told no one that I was
                  offering her to the Dornish. No one but you.
Grand Maester Pycelle: The eunuch has spies everywhere-
Tyrion Lannister: [to Timmet]  Cut off his manhood and feed it to the
                  goats.
Timmet: [confused]  There are no goats, halfman.
Tyrion Lannnister: [exasperated]  Well, make do!  [To Pycelle]  How
                   long have you been spying for my sister?
Grand Maester Pycelle: All I did, I did for House Lannister. Always.
                       Your lord father, ask him. I've always been his
                       servant, since the days of the Mad King.
Tyrion Lannister: [shakes his head]  I don't like his beard...
Grand Maester Pycelle: What?  [Bronn grabs Pycelle's beard]  No!
                       [Bronn cuts off the beard]  AH.
Tyrion Lannister: How many Hands have you betrayed, Pycelle? Eddard
                  Stark, Jon Arryn...
Grand Maester Pycelle: Lord Arryn! He knew, he knew the truth about
                       the Queen and he planned to act, to tell King
                       Robert-
Tyrion Lannister: So you poisoned him?
Grand Maester Pycelle: [outraged]  No! Never!
Tyrion Lannister: But you let him die! Made sure he succumbed!
Grand Maester Pycelle: [desperate]  Lannister, I've always served
                       Lannister...!
Tyrion Lannister: [disgusted]  Get him out of my sight! Throw him in
                  one of the black cells!  [Bronn and Timett drag a
                  protesting Pycelle out]

	"Game of Thrones: What Is Dead May Never Die [2.03], Season 2"
%
Varys: Should I be worried? Janos Slynt, Pycelle...the Small Council
       grows smaller every day.
Tyrion Lannister: The Council has a reputation for serving past Hands
                  poorly. I don't mean to follow Ned Stark to the
                  grave.
Varys: Power is a curious thing, my lord. Are you fond of riddles?
Tyrion Lannister: Why, am I about to hear one?
Varys: Three great men sit in a room; a king, a priest and a rich man.
       Between them stands a common sellsword. Each great man bids the
       sellsword kill the other two. Who lives, who dies?
Tyrion Lannister: Depends on the sellsword.
Varys: Does it? He has neither crown, nor gold, nor the favour of the
       gods.
Tyrion Lannister: He has a sword, the power of life and death.
Varys: But if it's swordsmen who rule, why do we pretend kings hold
       all the power? When Ned Stark lost his head, who was truly
       responsible? Joffrey? The executioner? Or something else?
Tyrion Lannister: I've decided I don't like riddles.
Varys: Power resides where men believe it resides. It's a trick, a
       shadow on the wall, and a very small man can cast a very large
       shadow.

	"Game of Thrones: What Is Dead May Never Die [2.03], Season 2"
%
[Tyrion storms in on Joffrey publicly tormenting Sansa, entering as
Joffrey tries to have her stripped naked]

Tyrion Lannister: [furious]  What is the meaning of this?! What kind
                  of knight beats a helpless girl?!
Meryn Trant: The kind who serves his king, Imp!
Bronn: Careful now, we don't want to get blood all over your pretty
       white cloak!
Tyrion Lannister: Someone get the girl something to cover herself
                  with.  [Sandor Clegane gives Sansa his cloak]  She's
                  to be your Queen. Have you no regard for her
                  honour?!
Joffrey Baratheon: I'm punishing her.
Tyrion Lannister: For what crimes?! She did not fight her brother's
                  battle, you halfwit!
Joffrey Baratheon: You can't talk to me like that! The king can do as
                   he likes!
Tyrion Lannister: The Mad King did as he liked. Has your uncle Jaime
                  ever told you what happened to him?
Meryn Trant: No one threatens His Grace in the presence of the
             Kingsguard!
Tyrion Lannister: I'm not threatening the king, ser. I'm educating my
                  nephew. Bronn, the next time Ser Meryn speaks, kill
                  him.  That  was a threat. See the difference?

	"Game of Thrones: Garden of Bones [2.04], Season 2"
%
[At a parley between Stannis and Renly Baratheon]

Renly Baratheon: Can that truly be you?
Stannis Baratheon: Who else might it be?
Renly Baratheon: When I saw your standard, I couldn't be sure. Whose
                 banner is that?
Stannis Baratheon: My own.
Renly Baratheon: I suppose if we use the same one, the battle will be
                 terribly confusing. Why is your stag on fire?
Melisandre: The king has taken for his sigil the fiery heart of the
            Lord of Light.
Renly Baratheon: [grins]  Ah, you must be this fire priestess we hear
                 so much about. Ah brother, now I understand why you
                 found religion in your old age!
Stannis Baratheon: Watch yourself, Renly!
Renly Baratheon: No, no, I'm relieved. I never really believed you
                 were a fanatic; charmless, rigid, a bore, yes, but
                 not a godly man.
Melisandre: You should kneel before your brother. He is the Lord's
            Chosen, born amidst salt and smoke.
Renly Baratheon: 'Born amidst salt and smoke'? Is he a ham?
Stannis Baratheon: That's twice I've warned you.
Catelyn Stark: Listen to yourselves! If you were sons of mine, I would
               knock your heads together and lock you in a bedchamber
               together until you remember you're brothers.
Stannis Baratheon: It is strange to find you beside my brother, Lady
                   Stark. Your husband was a supporter of my claim;
                   Lord Eddard's integrity cost him his head. And you
                   sit beside this pretender and chastise me?!
Catelyn Stark: We share a common enemy --
Stannis Baratheon: The Iron Throne is  mine  by right. All those who
                   deny that are my foes.
Renly Baratheon: The whole realm denies it, from Dorne to the Wall.
                 Old men deny it with their death rattles and unborn
                 children deny it in their mothers' wombs.  No one
                 wants you for their king. You never wanted any
                 friends, brother, but a man without friends is a man
                 without power.
Stannis Baratheon: For the sake of the mother who bore us, I will give
                   you this one night to reconsider. Strike your
                   banners, come to me before dawn and I will grant
                   you your old seat on the Council. I'll even name
                   you my heir, until a son is born to me. Otherwise I
                   shall destroy you.
Renly Baratheon: [motions to his army]  Look across those fields,
                 brother. Can you see all those banners?
Stannis Baratheon: You think a few bolts of cloth will make you king?!
Renly Baratheon: No. The men holding those bolts of cloth will make me
                 king!
Stannis Baratheon: We shall see, Renly. Come the dawn, we shall see!
                   [Stannis and his retinue turn to leave]
Melisandre: Look to your sins, Lord Renly. The night is dark and full
            of terrors.

	"Game of Thrones: Garden of Bones [2.04], Season 2"
%
Daenerys Targaryen: Where I come from, guests are treated with
                    respect, not insulted at the gates.
Trader of Spices: Then perhaps you should return to where you come
                  from. We wish you well.  [walks away]
Daenerys Targaryen: What are you doing? You promised to receive me!
Trader of Spices: We have received you. Here we are, and here you are.
Daenerys Targaryen: If you do not let us in, all of us will  die .
Trader of Spices: Which we shall deeply regret, but Qarth did not
                  become the greatest city that ever was or will be by
                  letting Dothraki savages through its gates.
Ser Jorah Mormont: Khaleesi, please be careful.
Daenerys Targaryen: [enraged]  Thirteen, when my dragons are grown, we
                    will take back what was stolen from me and
                    destroy  those who have wronged me! We will lay
                    waste to armies and burn cities to the ground!
                    Turn us away, and we will burn  you  first.

	"Game of Thrones: Garden of Bones [2.04], Season 2"
%
[Tywin Lannister has just arrived at Harrenhal]

Tywin Lannister: What's this?
Gregor Clegane: We weren't expecting you till tomorrow, Lord Tywin.
Tywin Lannister: [chuckles]  Evidently not. Why are these prisoners
                 not in their cells?
Gregor Clegane: Cells are overflowing, my Lord.
Polliver: This lot won't be here long. Don't need no permanent place.
          After we interrogate 'em we usually just --  [gestures
          towards the heads on spikes]
Tywin Lannister: Are we so well-manned that we can afford to discard
                 able young bodies and skilled laborers?  [Polliver
                 doesn't answer and Tywin turns to Gendry]  You, do
                 you have a trade?
Gendry: Smith, my Lord.
Polliver: [sees Arya staring]  What are you looking at? Kneel! Kneel
          or I'll carve your lungs out, boy.
Tywin Lannister: You'll do no such thing. This one's a girl...you
                 idiot! Dressed as a boy. Why?
Arya: Safer to travel, my Lord.
Tywin Lannister: Smart. More than I can say for this lot. Get these
                 prisoners to work. Bring the girl. I need a new
                 cupbearer.

	"Game of Thrones: Garden of Bones [2.04], Season 2"
%
Lancel Lannister: I am a Knight!
Tyrion Lannister: An anointed Knight, yes. Tell me, did Cersei have
                  you knighted before or after she took you into her
                  bed?  [Lancel is dumbstruck]  What? Nothing to say?
                  No more warnings for me, Ser?
Lancel Lannister: You will withdraw these filthy accusations-
Tyrion Lannister: Have you ever given any thought to what King Joffrey
                  will have to say when he finds out you have been
                  bedding his mother?
Lancel Lannister: [goes pale]  It's not my fault!
Tyrion Lannister: Did she take you against your will? Can you not
                  defend yourself, Knight?
Lancel Lannister: Your own father, Lord Tywin, when I was named the
                  King's squire, he told me to obey her in everything!
Tyrion Lannister: Did he tell you to fuck her, too?
Lancel Lannister: I only meant, I did as I was bid. I --
Tyrion Lannister: Hated every moment of it, is that what you'll have
                  me believe? A high place in court, a knighthood, my
                  sister's legs spreading open for you at night! Oh
                  yes, it must have been terrible! Wait here, His
                  Grace will want to hear this.  [Tyrion heads to the
                  door]
Lancel Lannister: [terrified]  Mercy! Mercy, my Lord! I beg you!
Tyrion Lannister: Save it for Joffrey; he loves a good grovel!!
Lancel Lannister: My Lord, it was your sister's bidding, the Queen!
                  I'll leave the city at once, I swear.
Tyrion Lannister: No, I think not.
Lancel Lannister: My Lord?
Tyrion Lannister: You heard me. My father told you to obey my sister.
                  Obey her. Stay close to her side. Keep her trust.
                  Pleasure her whenever she requires. No one ever need
                  know as long as you keep faith with me. I want to
                  know what Cersei is doing, where she goes, who she
                  sees, what they talk of, everything and you will
                  tell me.
Lancel Lannister: Yes, my lord, I will. I swear it as you command.
Tyrion Lannister: Oh rise, rise. Let us drink to our understanding.
                  Oh, you don't have a cup. Oh, well. Smile, cousin.
                  My sister is a beautiful woman. And it's all for the
                  good of the realm. Go back and tell her that I beg
                  her forgiveness, that I want no more conflict
                  between us and that henceforth I shall do nothing
                  without her consent.
Lancel Lannister: But, her demands...
Tyrion Lannister: Oh, I'll give her Pycelle.
Lancel Lannister: [surprised]  You will?
Tyrion Lannister: Yes, I'll release him in the morning. Cersei can
                  keep him as a pet if she wants, but I will not have
                  him on the council. I could swear that I had not
                  harmed a single hair on his head, but that would
                  not, strictly speaking, be true.

	"Game of Thrones: Garden of Bones [2.04], Season 2"
%
Stannis Baratheon: What is it?
Davos Seaworth: I'm sorry about your brother, Your Grace. I wanted to
                let you know people grieve for him.
Stannis Baratheon: Fools love a fool. I grieve for him as well, for
                   the boy he was, not the man he grew to be.
Davos Seaworth: I need to speak to you about what I saw in that
                cave...
Stannis Baratheon: I made it clear to you there'd be no need to speak
                   of this matter! I've never known you to need to
                   hear a thing twice.
Davos Seaworth: And I've never known you hide from the truth.
Stannis Baratheon: You come to lecture me on truth?!
Davos Seaworth: I've come to tell you what I saw-!
Stannis Baratheon: All  my brother's bannermen have come to my side,
                   except the Tyrells, who fled like cowards. They
                   won't be able to resist us now. Soon, I'll be
                   sitting on the Iron Throne.
Davos Seaworth: Nothing  is worth what this will cost you, not even
                the Iron-!
Stannis Baratheon: I'll hear no more about it.  [pause]
Davos Seaworth: When do we sail for King's Landing?
Stannis Baratheon: As soon as I've consolidated my troops. We'll make
                   short work of the Lannisters' fleet; once
                   Blackwater Bay is cleared, we'll deliver our troops
                   to their doorstep and take the city.
Davos Seaworth: And will you bring Lady Melisandre with you?
Stannis Baratheon: That's not your concern.
Davos Seaworth: If you take King's Landing with her by your side, the
                victory will be  hers .
Stannis Baratheon: I never thought I'd have reason to doubt your
                   loyalty. Was I wrong?
Davos Seaworth: Loyal service means telling hard truths.
Stannis Baratheon: [snorts]  Oh, truth again. Alright, what's the
                   truth? The hard truth.
Davos Seaworth: She's a foreigner, preaching a foreign religion. Some
                believe she whispers orders in your ear and you obey.
Stannis Baratheon: What do  you  believe?
Davos Seaworth: You won those bannermen from Renly. Don't lose them to
                her.  [pause]
Stannis Baratheon: We'll set out for King's Landing without Lady
                   Melisandre  [Davos nods] . And you'll lead the
                   fleet into Blackwater Bay.
Davos Seaworth: Your Grace, I'm honoured but my time on the sea was
                spent evading ships, not attacking them. The other
                lords won't be happy.
Stannis Baratheon: Most of those lords should consider themselves
                   lucky I don't hang them for treason. Hard truths
                   cut both ways, Ser Davos.

	"Game of Thrones: The Ghost of Harrenhal [2.05], Season 2"
%
Arya Stark: [On Robb Stark]  They call him 'The Young Wolf'. They say
            he rides into battle on the back of a giant direwolf. They
            say he can turn into a wolf himself when he wants. They
            say he can't be killed.
Tywin Lannister: And do you believe them?
Arya Stark: [Frowning]  No, my lord.  Anyone  can be killed.

	"Game of Thrones: The Ghost of Harrenhal [2.05], Season 2"
%
Priest: [preaching to a crowd in the street]  Corruption! Yes, we are
        swollen, bloated, foul! Brother fornicates with sister in the
        bed of kings, and we're  surprised  when the fruit of their
        incest is rotten?! Yes, a rotten king!
Tyrion Lannister: It's hard to argue with his assessment.
Bronn: Not after what he did to your birthday present.
Tyrion Lannister: The king is a lost cause. It's the rest of us I'm
                  worried about now.
Priest: A dancing king, prancing down his bloodstained halls to the
        tune of a twisted demon monkey!  [the crowd laughes]
Tyrion Lannister: [smiling]  You have to admire his imagination.
Bronn: He's talking about you.
Tyrion Lannister: [his smile fades]  What? "Demon monkey"?
Bronn: People think you're pulling the King's strings. They blame you
       for the city's ills.
Tyrion Lannister: Blame me? I'm trying to save them.
Bronn: You don't need to convince me.
Tyrion Lannister: [deflated]  Demon monkey.

	"Game of Thrones: The Ghost of Harrenhal [2.05], Season 2"
%
Daenerys Targaryen: My brother used to say the only thing the Dothraki
                    knew how to do was steal things better men had
                    built.
Jorah Mormont: Not the only thing. They're quite good at killing the
               better men.

	"Game of Thrones: The Ghost of Harrenhal [2.05], Season 2"
%
Brienne of Tarth: Once you're safely back amongst your own people,
                  will you give me leave to go, My Lady?
Catelyn Stark: You mean to kill Stannis.
Brienne of Tarth: I swore a vow.
Catelyn Stark: But Stannis has a great army around him. His own guards
               are sworn to keep him safe.
Brienne of Tarth: I'm as good as any of them. I should never have
                  fled.
Catelyn Stark: Renly's death was no fault of yours. You served him
               bravely.
Brienne of Tarth: I only held him that once as he was dying.
Catelyn Stark: He's gone, Brienne. You serve nothing and no one by
               following him into the earth. Renly's enemies are
               Robb's enemies as well.
Brienne of Tarth: I do not know your son, My Lady, but I could serve
                  you if you would have me. You have courage. Not
                  battle courage perhaps, but, I don't know, a woman's
                  kind of courage. And I think that when the time
                  comes, you will not hold me back. Promise me that
                  you will not hold me back from Stannis.
Catelyn Stark: When the time comes, I will not hold you back.
Brienne of Tarth: [offers her sword to Catelyn]  Then I am yours, My
                  Lady. I will shield your back and will give my life
                  for yours if it comes to that. I swear it by the Old
                  Gods and the New.
Catelyn Stark: [takes Brienne's hand]  I vow that you shall always
               have a place in my home and at my table, and that I
               shall ask no service of you that might bring you
               dishonor. I swear it by the Old Gods and the New.

	"Game of Thrones: The Ghost of Harrenhal [2.05], Season 2"
%
Tywin Lannister: [on the rumours of Renly Baratheon's death]  Men love
                 to blame demons when their grand plans unravel.

	"Game of Thrones: The Old Gods and the New [2.06], Season 2"
%
[After barely escaping a angry mob]

Joffrey Baratheon: Traitors! I'll have all their heads!
Tyrion Lannister: Oh, you blind, bloody fool!
Joffrey Baratheon: You can't insult me!
Tyrion Lannister: We've had vicious kings and we've had idiot kings,
                  but I don't know if we've  ever  been cursed with a
                  vicious idiot for a king!
Joffrey Baratheon: You can't-
Tyrion Lannister: I can, I am!
Joffrey Baratheon: They attacked  me !
Tyrion Lannister: They threw a cow pie at you, so you decided to kill
                  them all?! They're starving, you fool! All because
                  of the war  you  started!
Joffrey Baratheon: You're talking to a king!
Tyrion Lannister: [slaps Joffrey]  And now I've struck a king! Did my
                  hand fall from my wrist?  [to Meryn Trant]  Where is
                  the Stark girl?
Joffrey Baratheon: Let them have her!
Tyrion Lannister: If she dies, you'll never get your uncle Jaime back!
                  You owe him quite a bit, you know.

	"Game of Thrones: The Old Gods and the New [2.06], Season 2"
%
Spice King: Look what a beauty you are now that the Red Waste has been
            washed of you. I am sorry about all that unpleasantness.
            The silver hair of a true Targaryen. Xaro Xhoan Doxas, she
            is far to lovely for a glorified dock worker like
            yourself.
Xaro Xhoan Doxas: Very true, and yet they say that your grandfather
                  sold pepper on the back of a wagon, married a lady
                  far lovelier and higher-born than himself.
Spice King: Every lady alive was lovelier and higher-born than my
            grandfather.  [Daenaerys cleares her throat]  Did my
            servants not offer you anything to eat? To drink? I shall
            have them flogged in the square-
Daenerys Targaryen: Thank you my lord, you are a gracious host, but
                    there is no servant alive that can bring me what I
                    want.
Spice King: Ah, she has a talent for drama this one. So my little
            princess, what is it you want?
Daenerys Targaryen: My birthright; the Seven Kingdoms of Westeros.
Spice King :I fear I'm no better than a servant in this regard; I
             cannot give you what I do not have
Daenerys Targaryen: I'm not asking you for the Kingdoms. I'm asking
                    you for ships. I need to cross the Narrow Sea
Spice King: I need my ships as well. I use them, you see, to bring
            spices from one port to another-
Daenerys Targaryen: Whatever you grant me now will be repaid  three
                    times  over when I retake the Iron Throne.
Spice King: Retake? Did you once sit on the Iron Throne?
Daenerys Targaryen: My father sat there before he was murdered.
Spice King: If you did not sit on it yourself, would it not be
            correcter to say 'take' the Iron Throne?
Daenerys Targaryen: I did not come here to argue grammar.
Spice King: Of course not. You came to take my ships. So let me
            explain my position little princess. Unlike you, I do not
            have exulted ancestors. I make my living by trade and I
            judge every trade on its merits. You ask for ships. You
            say I will be repaid triple. I do not doubt your honesty
            or intentions, but before you repay your debts your must
            seize the Seven Kingdoms . Do you have an army?
Daenerys Targaryen: Not yet.
Spice King: You do not have an army. Do you have powerful allies in
            Westeros?
Daenerys Targaryen: There are many there who support my claim.
Spice King: When were you there last?
Daenerys Targaryen: I left when I was a baby.
Spice King: So in truth you have no allies.
Daenerys Targaryen: The people will rise to fight for their rightful
                    Queen when I return.
Spice King: Ah. Forgive me little princess, but I cannot make an
            investment based on wishes and dreams!

	"Game of Thrones: The Old Gods and the New [2.06], Season 2"
%
Daenerys Targaryen: I am Daenerys Stormborn, of the blood of Old
                    Valyria and I  will  take what is mine, with fire
                    and blood!

	"Game of Thrones: The Old Gods and the New [2.06], Season 2"
%
[Robb Stark learns that Theon Greyjoy has betrayed him and seized
Winterfell]

Robb Stark: This  cannot  be true.
Lord Roose Bolton: We've had ravens from White Harbour, Barrowtown and
                   the Dreadfort, my lord. I'm afraid it is true.
Robb Stark: Why? Why would Theon-?
Roose Bolton: Because the Greyjoys are treasonous whores.
Robb Stark: My brothers?
Roose Bolton: We've heard nothing of them...but Rodrik Cassell is
              dead.
Catelyn Stark: [angry]  I  told  you, never  trust a Greyjoy!
Robb Stark: I must go north at once.
Roose Bolton: There's still a war to win, Your Grace-!
Robb Stark: How can I call myself 'King' if I can't hold my own
            castle?! How can I ask men to follow me if-?!
Roose Bolton: You  are  a king! And that means you  don't  have to do
              everything yourself.
Catelyn Stark: Let me go and talk to Theon-
Robb Stark: There will be  no  talk, he  will  die for this!
Roose Bolton: Theon holds the castle with a skeleton crew. Let me send
              word to my bastard son at the Dreadfort; he can raise a
              few hundred men and retake Winterfell before the new
              moon. We have the Lannisters on the run; if you march
              all the way back north now, you lose what you gained. My
              boy would be honoured to bring you Prince Theon's head.
Robb Stark: Tell your son Bran and Rickon's safety is paramount. And
            Theon...I want him brought to me alive. I want to look him
            in the eye and ask him 'Why?'...and then I will take his
            head myself!

	"Game of Thrones: The Old Gods and the New [2.06], Season 2"
%
Ygritte: You know  nothing , Jon Snow.

	"Game of Thrones: A Man Without Honor [2.07], Season 2"
%
Ser Jorah Mormont: I shouldn't have left you alone with these people.
Daenerys Targaryen: These people?
Ser Jorah Mormont: They are not to be trusted.
Daenerys Targaryen: Who is to be trusted? Who are my people? The
                    Targaryens? I only knew one: my brother, and he
                    would have let a thousand men  rape me  if it
                    would have gotten him the crown. The Dothraki?
                    Most of them turned on me the day that Khal Drogo
                    fell from his horse.
Ser Jorah Mormont: Your people are in Westeros.
Daenerys Targaryen: The people in Westeros don't know I'm alive!
Ser Jorah Mormont: They will soon enough.
Daenerys Targaryen: And then what? They'll pray for my return? They'll
                    wave dragon banners and shout my name? That's what
                    my brother believed and he's a fool.
Ser Jorah Mormont: You are not your brother. Trust me, Khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: There it is: trust me. And it's you I should
                    trust, Ser Jorah? Only you? I don't  need  trust
                    any longer. I don't want it and I don't have room
                    for it.
Ser Jorah Mormont: You are too young to be so–
Daenerys Targaryen: And you are too familiar!
Ser Jorah Mormont: Forgive me, Khaleesi. No one can survive in this
                   world without help. No one. Let me help you,
                   please. Tell me how.
Daenerys Targaryen: Find my dragons.

	"Game of Thrones: A Man Without Honor [2.07], Season 2"
%
Pyat Pree: [to The Thirteen]  The Mother of Dragons will be with her
           babies. She will give them her love and they will thrive by
           her side. Forever.  [The Thirteen have their throats cut by
           multiple Prees]  A mother should be with her children.
           Where will you run to, Daenerys Stormborn? Your dragons
           wait for you in the House of the Undying. Come see them.

	"Game of Thrones: A Man Without Honor [2.07], Season 2"
%
Tyrion Lannister: It's just you, me and Joffrey, the "Lord of the
                  Seven Kingdoms and Protector of the Realm".
Cersei Lannister: I'm sure you'll make a point eventually.
Tyrion Lannister: He  needs  to start acting like a king! This war you
                  started is coming to our doorstep and if the entire
                  city wants Joffrey dead...
Cersei Lannister: I'm not the one giving the boy whores to abuse!
Tyrion Lannister: I thought the girls might help him.
Cersei Lannister: Did you?!
Tyrion Lannister: I was wrong! If we can't control him–
Cersei Lannister: Do you think I haven't tried?! He  doesn't  listen
                  to me!
Tyrion Lannister: [nodding]  It's hard to put a leash on a dog once
                  you've put a crown on its head.
Cersei Lannister: I always hoped he'd be like Jaime. He looks like
                  him, in a certain light.
Tyrion Lannister: The boy's more Robert than Jaime.
Cersei Lannister: Robert was a drunken fool, but he didn't enjoy
                  cruelty. Sometimes, I wonder–
Tyrion Lannister: What?
Cersei Lannister: If this is the price for what we've done. For our
                  sins.
Tyrion Lannister: Sins? The Targaryens–
Cersei Lannister: Wed brother and sister for hundreds of years, I
                  know. It's what Jaime and I would say to each other
                  in our moments of doubt. It's what I told Ned Stark
                  when he was stupid enough to confront me. Half the
                  Targaryens went mad, didn't they? What's the saying?
                  "Every time a Targaryen is born, the gods flip a
                  coin."
Tyrion Lannister: You've beaten the odds. Tommen and Myrcella are
                  good, decent children, both of them.

	"Game of Thrones: A Man Without Honor [2.07], Season 2"
%
Jaime Lannister: Come to say goodbye, Lady Stark? I believe it's my
                 last night in this world.  [looks at Brienne]  Is
                 that a woman?
Catelyn Stark: Do you hear them out there? They want your head.
Jaime Lannister: Well, old Lord Karstark doesn't seem to like me.
Catelyn Stark: You strangled his son with your chains.
Jaime Lannister: Oh, oh. Was he the one on guard duty? He was in my
                 way. Any knight would have done the same.
Catelyn Stark: You are no knight. You have forsaken every vow you ever
               took.
Jaime Lannister: So many vows. They make you swear and swear. Defend
                 the King, obey the King, obey your father, protect
                 the innocent, defend the weak. But what if your
                 father despises the King? What if the King massacres
                 the innocent? It's too much. No matter what you do,
                 you're forsaking one vow or another.  [indicating
                 Brienne]  Where did you find this beast?
Catelyn Stark: She is a truer knight than you will ever be,
               Kingslayer.
Jaime Lannister: Kingslayer . And what a king he was! Here's to Aerys
                 Targaryen, the second of his name, Lord of the Seven
                 Kingdoms, Protector of the Realm, and to the sword I
                 shoved in his back!
Catelyn Stark: You are a man without honor.
Jaime Lannister: Do you know I've never been with any woman but
                 Cersei? So in my own way, I have more honor than poor
                 old dead Ned. What was the name of the bastard he
                 fathered?
Catelyn Stark: Brienne.
Jaime Lannister: No, that wasn't it. Snow, a bastard from the North.
                 Now when- when good old Ned came home with some
                 whore's baby, did you pretend to love it? No. You're
                 not very good at pretending. You're an honest woman.
                 You hated that boy, didn't you? How could you not
                 hate him? The walking, talking reminder that the
                 honorable Lord Eddard Stark fucked another woman.
Catelyn Stark: [to Brienne]  Your sword.

	"Game of Thrones: A Man Without Honor [2.07], Season 2"
%
Theon Greyjoy: You should be proud of your brother's achievement. I
               took the great castle of Winterfell with 20 men.
Yara Greyjoy: You're a great warrior. I saw the bodies above your
              gates. Which one gave you the tougher fight, the cripple
              or the six-year-old?
Theon Greyjoy: I treated the Stark boys with honor and they repaid me
               with treachery.
Yara Greyjoy: You treated them with honor by butchering them?
Theon Greyjoy: Before I had to kill them, I treated them–
Yara Greyjoy: You seized their home, as is your right. We're Ironborn;
              we take what we need.
Theon Greyjoy: Exactly.
Yara Greyjoy: Then you made them prisoners in their home and they ran
              away. Is that treachery? I'd call it bravery.
Theon Greyjoy: They made me a promise–
Yara Greyjoy: Your little boy prisoners made you a promise and you got
              mad when they broke it? Are you the dumbest cunt alive?
Theon Greyjoy: Don't call me a–
Yara Greyjoy: A cunt. A dumb cunt who killed the only two Starks in
              Winterfell. You know how valuable those boys were?
Theon Greyjoy: If I hadn't killed them, the Northerners would think me
               weak.
Yara Greyjoy: You are weak. And you're stupid.

	"Game of Thrones: The Prince of Winterfell [2.08], Season 2"
%
[After Jaqen has stated he cannot kill Tywin Lannister in time]

Arya Stark: You promised you'd help me.
Jaqen H'ghar: Help was not promised, lovely girl. Only death. There
              must be others. Give a name, any name.
Arya Stark: And you'll kill them? Anybody?
Jaqen H'ghar: By the Seven New Gods and the Old Gods beyond counting,
              I swear it.
Arya Stark: Alright. Jaqen H'ghar.
Jaqen H'ghar: A girl gives a man his own name?
Arya Stark: That's right.
Jaqen H'ghar: Gods are not mocked. This is no joking thing.
Arya Stark: I'm not joking. A man can go kill himself.
Jaqen H'ghar: Un-name me.
Arya Stark: No.
Jaqen H'ghar: Please?
Arya Stark: I'll unname you.
Jaqen H'ghar: Thank you.
Arya Stark: If you help me and my friends escape.
Jaqen H'ghar: This would require more than one life. This is not part
              of our bargain.
Arya Stark: Fine, Jaqen H'ghar.
Jaqen H'ghar: A girl lacks honor.  [Arya shrugs]  If I do this thing,
              a girl must obey.
Arya Stark: A girl will obey.
Jaqen H'ghar: A girl and her friends will walk through the gate at
              midnight.

	"Game of Thrones: The Prince of Winterfell [2.08], Season 2"
%
Davos Seaworth: I understand why the older families look down at me.
Stannis Baratheon: Do you? Why?
Davos Seaworth: My father was a crabber. Sons of lords don't like to
                break bread with sons of crabbers; our hands stink.
Stannis Baratheon: And where were those lords when Storm's End
                   starved?!
Davos Seaworth: Many fought bravely for your brother. Many fought for
                the Mad King.
Stannis Baratheon: You defend these men who insult you behind your
                   back.
Davos Seaworth: Some are happy to do it to my face.
Stannis Baratheon: [angry]  We were forgotten. Robert and Ned Stark,
                   they were the heroes, the glorious rebels. Marching
                   from battle to battle, liberating towns from the
                   yoke of the Mad King while I held Storm's End with
                   500 men.
Davos Seaworth: No one's forgotten, your Grace.
Stannis Baratheon: No?  Robert  did. He gave Storm's End to Renly
                   after the war. Renly never fought a day in his
                   life!
Davos Seaworth: He was only a boy.
Stannis Baratheon: Then why give him Storm's End?  [pause]  First, we
                   ate the horses. We weren't riding anywhere, not
                   with the castle surrounded. We couldn't feed them,
                   so fine. The horses, then the cats-I've never liked
                   cats, so fine. I do like dogs - good animals, loyal
                   - but we ate them too. Then the rats... The night
                   before you slipped through, I thought my wife was
                   dying. She couldn't speak anymore, she was so
                   frail. And then  you  made it through the lines,
                   slipped right through in your little black sail
                   boat with your onions...
Davos Seaworth: And some potatoes. Some salted beef, I believe.
Stannis Baratheon: Every man at Storm's End wanted to kiss you that
                   night.
Davos Seaworth: [smiles]  I was relieved they did not.
Stannis Baratheon: Robert told me to hold Storm's End, so I held it.
                   Then he told me he was giving it to Renly, so I
                   gave it up. Insult or no, I gave it up because
                   Robert was my older brother and he was the king and
                   I've always done my duty. But now,  I  am the
                   rightful king by every law of Westeros. And when I
                   sit the Iron Throne,  you  will be my Hand.
Davos Seaworth: Your Grace... [he kneels]  I pray I serve you well.
Stannis Baratheon: I expect you'll be the first crabber's son to wear
                   the badge.

	"Game of Thrones: The Prince of Winterfell [2.08], Season 2"
%
Cersei Lannister: [quiet and angry]  Do you think I'm an  idiot ?!
Tyrion Lannister: I'd say you possess above average intelligence...
Cersei Lannister: You shipped off my only daughter. Now you want to
                  send my eldest son to the battlefield to die.
Tyrion Lannister: He'll have his Kingsguard protecting him, he has the
                  finest armour gold can buy; he  needs  to be out
                  there. The men will fight more fiercely seeing their
                  King fighting beside them, instead of hiding behind
                  his mother's skirts.
Cersei Lannister: Do you know why Varys is so dangerous?
Tyrion Lannister: Because he has thousands of spies in his employ?
                  Because he knows everything we do before we do it?
Cersei Lannister: Because he doesn't have a cock.
Tyrion Lannister: Neither do you.
Cersei Lannister: Perhaps I'm dangerous, too. You, on the other hand,
                  are as big a fool as every other man. That little
                  worm between your legs does half your thinking for
                  you.
Tyrion Lannister: It's not that little.  [Cersei laughes humourlessly]
                  Why are you laughing?
Cersei Lannister: Because I'm  happy !
Tyrion Lannister: [suspicious]  And why are you happy?
Cersei Lannister: Because I have your little whore.
Tyrion Lannister: [disconcerted, then sarcastic]  I thought you
                  preferred blondes.
Cersei Lannister: Such a droll little fellow. Tell me, have you
                  married this one yet? No? Good, Father will be so
                  pleased!
Tyrion Lannister: Why do you care who I fuck?
Cersei Lannister: Because a Lannister always pays her debts. You stole
                  my daughter, you plot to have Joffrey killed–
Tyrion Lannister: This is  madness . Stannis will be here in days, you
                  need me.
Cersei Lannister: For  what ?! Your skill in battle?! Pretty thing,
                  your whore. Lovely body; the bruises will heal in
                  time...
Tyrion Lannister: Where did you find her?
Cersei Lannister: Varys isn't the only one who hears whispers. Really,
                  a Lannister lion necklace? You need to hide your
                  secret whores more carefully.
Tyrion Lannister: You've forgotten the most important thing about
                  whores...
Cersei Lannister: Oh? Well, you're the expert, tell me.
Tyrion Lannister: You don't buy them, you only rent them.
Cersei Lannister: You're usually a better liar, baby brother. This one
                  you like. You like her very much...  [mocking]
                  Could it be love? Don't worry, she'll be treated
                  gently enough... unless Joffrey is hurt, and then
                  every wound he suffers, she'll suffer too. And if he
                  dies, there isn't a man alive who could advise a
                  more painful death for your little cunt.
Tyrion Lannister: [struggling to hold back his anger]  And how do I
                  know you haven't killed her already?
Cersei Lannister: You'd like to see her? I thought you might.  [to the
                  guard]  Ser Mandon, bring in my brother's whore.
                  [Two Kingsguard knights drag in a beaten Ros]
Tyrion Lannister: [to Ros]  I'm sorry they hurt you. You must be
                  brave. I promise, I will free you.
Ros: Don't forget me.
Tyrion Lannister: Never. [the knights drag her out. Tyrion turns to
                  face a grinning Cersei]  I  will  hurt you for this.
                  A day will come when you think you are safe and
                  happy and your joy will turn to ashes in your
                  mouth... and you will know the debt is paid.
                  [Cersei's grin falters]
Cersei: Get out.

	"Game of Thrones: The Prince of Winterfell [2.08], Season 2"
%
Joffrey Baratheon: You're the Master of Whisperers. You're supposed to
                   know everything.
Varys: No man can be in all rooms at all times. I have many little
       birds in the North, My Lord, but I haven't heard their songs
       since Theon Greyojoy captured Winterfell.
Joffrey Baratheon: The Stark forces are distracted. Now is the time to
                   strike.
Tyrion Lannister: To strike? My dear nephew, you do see these men
                  preparing the walls for siege? You do understand
                  Stannis Baratheon sails this way?
Joffrey Baratheon: If my uncle Stannis lands on the shores of King's
                   Landing, I'll ride out to greet him.
Tyrion Lannister: A brave choice, Your Grace. I'm sure your men will
                  line up behind you.
Joffrey Baratheon: They say Stannis never smiles.  [unsheathes his
                   dagger]  I'll give him a red smile, from ear to
                   ear.
[Joffrey walks away]

Tyrion Lannister: Imagine Stannis's terror.
Varys: [deadpan]  I am trying.
...

Tyrion Lannister: The Lord of Light wants his enemies burned. The
                  Drowned God wants them drowned. Why are all the gods
                  such vicious cunts? Where is the god of tits and
                  wine?
Varys: In the Summer Isles, they worship a fertility goddess with
       sixteen teats.
Tyrion Lannister: We should sail there immediately.

	"Game of Thrones: The Prince of Winterfell [2.08], Season 2"
%
Ser Jorah Mormont: Careful, Khaleesi. Xaro owns this city and the
                   warlocks have a thousand eyes watching for you. I
                   found one. A ship with a good captain. She leaves
                   for Astapor tomorrow.
Daenerys Targaryen: Astapor?
Ser Jorah Mormont: We cannot stay here.
Daenerys Targaryen: They have my dragons! A mother does not flee
                    without her children.
Ser Jorah Mormont: They're not your children. I know they call you the
                   Mother of Dragons, and I know you love them, but
                   you did not grow them in your womb. They did not
                   suckle at your breast. They are  dragons ,
                   Khaleesi, and if we stay in Qarth we'll die.
Daenerys Targaryen: You should sail to Astapor. I'm sure you'll be
                    safe there.  [turns and walks away]
Ser Jorah Mormont: You know I would die for you. I will never abandon
                   you. I'm sworn to protect you. To serve.
Daenerys Targaryen: Then  serve me ! If my dragons are in the House of
                    the Undying, then take me there.
Ser Jorah Mormont: That's what the warlock wants. He told you so
                   himself! If you enter that place you will never
                   leave again. His magic is strong.
Daenerys Targaryen: And what of  my  magic? You saw me step into the
                    fire. You watched the witch burn, and what did the
                    flames do to me? Do you remember?
Ser Jorah Mormont: Until my last breath I will remember. After I have
                   forgotten my mother's face.
Daenerys Targaryen: [strokes Jorah's face]  They are my children, and
                    they are the only children I will  ever  have.
                    Take me to them.

	"Game of Thrones: The Prince of Winterfell [2.08], Season 2"
%
[As they approach King's Landing]

Matthos Seaworth: You're coming home
Davos Seasworth: King's Landing hasn't been home for 20 years. I spent
                 most of my life dodging the Royal Fleet. And now I'm
                 sailing right at them.
Matthos Seasworth: This  is the Royal Fleet. And you're not a smuggler
                   anymore, you're the High Captain.
Davos Seasworth: Of course there are several Royal Fleets at the
                 moment.
Matthos Seasworth: Not after tonight. When the sun rises, Stannis will
                   sit on the Iron Throne and you will be his Hand.
Davos Seasworth: Gods be good.
Matthos Seasworth: God. Father, there is only one and he watches over
                   us.
Davos Seasworth: But not over them?
Matthos Seasworth: Over all of us. The people of King's Landing did
                   not choose the false King Joffrey Baratheon. They
                   will be glad to see his head on a spike.
Davos Seasworth: Well, first we have to put it there.
Matthos Seasworth: Our ships outnumber theirs ten to one. Our army
                   outnumber theirs five to one.
Davos Seasworth: Those walls have never been breached. And the men
                 guarding the walls, when they see you, they don't see
                 a liberator. They see a stranger come to set their
                 city on fire.
Matthos Seasworth: I have faith in the Lord of Light. I have faith in
                   our cause. And I have faith in my captain.

	"Game of Thrones: Blackwater [2.09], Season 2"
%
[The Baratheon fleet approaches King's Landing unopposed]

Davos Seaworth: (alarmed)  Where are their ships?
Matthos Seaworth: It is wise to attack at night; We took them by
                  surprise.
Davos Seaworth: Lord Varys knows what you had for breakfast three days
                ago. There are no surprises here.
Matthos Seaworth: Is it true that there's dissension in their ranks?
                  Maybe their sailors have mutinied.
Davos Seaworth: Maybe...

	"Game of Thrones: Blackwater [2.09], Season 2"
%
Lancel Lannister: Where's our fleet?!
Tyrion Lannister: On their way.
Joffrey Baratheon: Why isn't it here now?! They're coming!  [Tyrion
                   ignores him]  Hound, tell the Hand that his King
                   has asked him a question.
Sandor Clegane: (sighs)  The King has asked you a question.
Tyrion Lannister: Ser Lancel, tell the Hound to tell the King that the
                  Hand is  extremely  busy.
Lancel Lannister: [to Sandor]  The Hand would like me to tell you, to
                  tell the King–
Joffrey Baratheon: If I tell the Hound to cut you in half, he'll do it
                   without a second thought.
Tyrion Lannister: That would make me the "Quarter Man"; just doesn't
                  have the same ring to it. Cut me in half and I won't
                  be able to give the signal. No signal, no plan. No
                  plan and Stannis Baratheon sacks this city, takes
                  the Iron Throne, puts your pinched little head atop
                  a gate somewhere. It might be quite amusing, except
                  my head would be up there  too ! I've never much
                  liked my head, but I don't want to see it removed
                  just yet.

	"Game of Thrones: Blackwater [2.09], Season 2"
%
Sandor Clegane: (returning from a sortie)  Someone get me a drink.  (a
                squire hands him some water, which he sips and spits
                out)  Fuck the water, bring me wine!

	"Game of Thrones: Blackwater [2.09], Season 2"
%
Tyrion Lannister: [quietly, to himself]   I'll lead the attack.
                  [rallying his troops]  I'll lead the attack! Pod, my
                  helmet. Ser Mandon, you will bear the King's banner.
                  Men, form up! Men! Men! They say I'm half a man, but
                  what does that make the lot of you?!
Lannister Soldier: The only way out is through the gates, and they're
                   at the gates!
Tyrion Lannister: There's another way out; I'm going to show you.
                  We'll come out behind them and fuck them in their
                  arses!  [the men laugh]  Don't fight for your king
                  and don't fight for his kingdoms! Don't fight for
                  honour, don't fight for glory, don't fight for
                  riches, because you won't get any! This is  your
                  city Stannis means to sack, that's  your  gate he's
                  ramming! If he gets in, it'll be  your  houses he
                  burns,  your  gold he steals,  your  women he'll
                  rape. Those are brave men knocking at our door.
                  Let's go kill them!  [the men cheer]

	"Game of Thrones: Blackwater [2.09], Season 2"
%
Sandor Clegane: The lady's starting to panic.
Sansa Stark: [starts in surprise]  What are you doing here?
Sandor Clegane: Not here long. I'm going.
Sansa Stark: Where?
Sandor Clegane: Someplace that isn't burning. North, might be. Could
                be.
Sansa Stark: What about the King?
Sandor Clegane: He can die just fine on his own. I can take you with
                me. Take you to Winterfell. I'll keep you safe. Do you
                want to go home?
Sansa Stark: I'll be safe here. Stannis won't hurt me.
Sandor Clegane: [steps in close, frightening Sansa]  Look at me.
                Stannis is a killer. The Lannisters are killers. Your
                father was a killer. Your brother is a killer. Your
                sons will be killers someday. The world is built by
                killers. So you'd better get used to looking at them.
Sansa Stark: You won't hurt me.
Sandor Clegane: No, little bird, I won't hurt you.

	"Game of Thrones: Blackwater [2.09], Season 2"
%
Cersei Lannister: (believing the battle is lost)  Shh. Calm, my sweet.
Tommen Baratheon: They're still fighting.
Cersei Lannister: No one's going to hurt you. I'll tell you a story.
                  You know the one about the mother lion and her
                  little cub; they lived in the woods.
Tommen Baratheon: The Kingswood.
Cersei Lannister: Yes, my love. In the Kingswood lived a mother and
                  her cub. She loved him very much, but there were
                  other things that lived in the woods. Evil things.
Tommen Baratheon: Like what?
Cersei Lannister: Like stags.
Tommen Baratheon: Stags aren't evil. They only eat grass.
Cersei Lannister: And wolves. They could hear them crying in the
                  night, and the cub was frightened. His mother said,
                  you are a lion, my son. You mustn't be afraid, for
                  one day all the beasts will bow to you. You will be
                  king. All the stags will bow, all the wolves will
                  bow, the bears in the north and the foxes of the
                  south, all the birds in the sky and the beasts in
                  the sea. They will all come to you, little lion, to
                  rest a crown upon your head. And the cub said, will
                  I be strong and fierce like my father? Yes, said his
                  mother. You will be strong and fierce, just like
                  your father.  (takes out a bottle of poison)  I will
                  keep you safe, my love.  (brings the poison to
                  Tommen's lips)  I promise you.  (seconds before
                  Tommen drinks the poison, Lannister and Tyrell
                  soldiers burst into the throne room, along with
                  Tywin Lannister and Loras Tyrell)  Father!  (drops
                  the poison)
Tywin Lannister: The battle is over; We have won!

	"Game of Thrones: Blackwater [2.09], Season 2"
%
Joffrey Baratheon: I, Joffrey of the House Baratheon, First of My
                   Name, the rightful king of the Andals and the First
                   Men, Lord of the Seven Kingdoms and Protector of
                   the Realm, do hereby proclaim my grandfather Tywin
                   Lannnister the savior of the city and the Hand of
                   the King.
Tywin Lannister: Thank you, Your Grace.
Joffrey Baratheon: Lord Petyr Baelish, step forward. For your good
                   service and ingenuity in uniting the Houses of
                   Lannister and Tyrell, I declare you shall be
                   granted the castle of Harrenhal with all its
                   attendant lands and incomes to be held by your sons
                   and grandsons from this day until the end of time.
Petyr Baelish: You honor me beyond words, Your Grace. I shall have to
               acquire some sons and grandsons.
Joffrey Baratheon: Ser Loras Tyrell. Your House has come to our aid.
                   The whole realm is in your debt, none more so than
                   I. If your family would ask anything of me, ask it
                   and it shall be yours.
Loras Tyrell: Your Grace, my sister Margaery, her husband was taken
              from us before... She remains innocent. I would ask you
              to find it in your heart to do us the great honor of
              joining our Houses.
Joffrey Baratheon: Is this what you want, Lady Margaery?
Margaery Tyrell: With all my heart, Your Grace. I have come to love
                 you from afar. Tales of your courage and wisdom have
                 never been far from my ears. And those tales have
                 taken root deep inside of me.
Joffrey Baratheon: Well, I too have heard tales of your beauty and
                   grace, but the tales, do not do you justice, My
                   Lady. It would be an honor to return your love, but
                   I am promised to another. A King must keep his
                   word.
Cersei Lannister: Your Grace, in the judgment of your Small Council,
                  it would neither be proper nor wise for you to wed
                  the daughter of a man beheaded for treason, a girl
                  whose brother is in open rebellion against the
                  throne as we speak. For the good of the realm, your
                  councilors beg you to set Sansa Stark aside.
Joffrey Baratheon: I would like to heed your wishes and the wishes of
                   my people, but I took a holy vow.
Grand Maester Pycelle: Your Grace, the Gods do indeed hold betrothal
                       solemn, but your father, blessed be his memory,
                       made this pact before the Starks revealed their
                       falseness. I have consulted with the High
                       Septon and he assures me that their crimes
                       against the realm free you from any promise you
                       have made to them in the sight of the Gods.
Joffrey Baratheon: The Gods are good. I am freed to heed my heart. Ser
                   Loras, I will gladly wed your sweet sister.  [to
                   Margaery]  You will be my Queen and I will love you
                   from this day until my last day.

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Morghulis [2.10], Season 2"
%
Daenerys Targaryen: [while experiencing a vision, enters a Dothraki
                    hut to find Khal Drogo and their son]
Khal Drogo: Moon of my life.
Daenerys Targaryen: This is dark magic, like the magic that took you
                    from me. Took you from me before I could
                    even...Maybe I am dead and I just don't know it
                    yet. Maybe I am with you in the Night Lands.
Khal Drogo: Or maybe I refused to enter the Night Lands without you.
            Maybe I told the Great Stallion to go fuck himself and
            came back here to wait for you.
Daenerys Targaryen: [smiles tearfully]  That sounds like something you
                    would do.
Khal Drogo: Or maybe it is a dream. Your dream. My dream. I do not
            know. These are questions for wise men with skinny arms.
            You are the moon of my life. That is all I know and all I
            need to know. And if this is a dream, I will kill the man
            who tries to wake me.
Daenerys Targaryen: Until the sun rises in the west and sets in the
                    east, until the rivers run dry and the mountains
                    blow in the wind like leaves.

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Morghulis [2.10], Season 2"
%
Pyat Pree: They miss their mother. They want to be with you. Do you
           want to be with them? You will be. When your dragons were
           born our magic was born again. It is strongest in their
           presence, and they are strongest in yours. You will be with
           them through winter, summer and winter again. Just a
           thousand, thousand seasons you will be with them, and we
           will be with you until time comes to and end. Welcome home,
           Daenerys Stormborn.
Daenerys Targaryen: This is not my home. My home is across the sea
                    where my people are waiting for me.
Pyat Pree: They will be waiting a long time.

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Morghulis [2.10], Season 2"
%
Stannis Baratheon: You said you saw my victory in the flames.
Melisandre: I did. I still see it.
Stannis Baratheon: The flames lied. And I'm no better than a savage,
                   trusting in a fire god! I fought for your god in
                   Blackwater Bay. I led my men to the gates of the
                   Seventh Hell as their brothers burned alive and for
                   what ?! An attack from behind by Tywin Lannister
                   and the Tyrells?! If you see so much in your
                   flames, why didn't you warn me?!
Melisandre: The Lord of Light only allows me glimpses-!
Stannis Baratheon: You  claim  to speak for a god!
Melisandre: Will you quit the war just because you've lost a battle?
Stannis Baratheon: You talk about war as if you understand it.
Melisandre: I've been fighting far longer than you.
Stannis Baratheon: Have you? Show me how you fight!  [Stannis seizes
                   Melisandre by the throat and starts throttling her]
                   Show me! Where is your god now? Will he save you?
                   [Melisandre stops struggling]  Where is your god?!
Melisandre: Inside you.  [stunned, Stannis releases her]
Stannis Baratheon: [horrified]  I murdered my brother!
Melisandre: We  murdered him. Share the weight with me.
Stannis Baratheon: He wasn't  your  brother.
Melisandre: This war has just begun. It will last for years. Thousands
            will die at your command. You will betray the men serving
            you, you will betray your family, you will betray
            everything you once held dear...and it will all be worth
            it, because you are the Son of Fire, you are the Warrior
            of Light. You will sweep aside this pretender and that
            one; you  will  be king.

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Morghulis [2.10], Season 2"
%
[Theon Greyjoy rallies his men for battle. A horn blows outside
Winterfell]

Theon Greyjoy: You hear that? That's the mating call of the Northmen.
               They want to fuck us! Well, I haven't had a good fuck
               in weeks, I'm ready for one!  [his men laugh]  They say
               every Ironborn man is worth a dozen from the mainland.
               You think they're right?!
Black Lorren: Aye.
Theon Greyjoy: We die today, brothers. We die bleeding from a hundred
               wounds, with arrows in our necks and spears in our
               guts...but our war cries will echo through eternity!
               They will sing about the Battle of Winterfell until the
               Iron Islands have slipped beneath the waves! Every man,
               woman and child will know who we were and how long we
               stood! Aggar and Gelmar, Wex and Urzen, Stygg and Black
               Lorren! Ironborn warriors will cry out our names as
               they leap onto the shores of Seagard and Faircastle.
Ironborn: Aye!
Theon Greyjoy: Mothers will name their sons for us!
Ironborn: Aye!
Theon Greyjoy: Girls will think of us with us with their lovers inside
               them!
Ironborn: Aye!  [the horn blows again]
Theon Greyjoy: And whoever kills that  fucking  horn blower  will
               stand in bronze above the shores of Pyke!
Ironborn: Aye!
Theon Greyjoy: WHAT IS DEAD MAY NEVER DIE!
Ironborn: What is dead may never die!  [As Theon screams a war cry,
          Dagmer hits him over the head with a spear, knocking him
          out]
Black Lorren: Thought he'd never shut up.
Dagmer Cleftjaw: It was a good speech. Didn't want to interrupt.

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Morghulis [2.10], Season 2"
%
[After Xaro's deceit is revealed]

Jorah Mormont: It's all a lie.
Daenerys Targaryen: Looks real enough to me.  [takes a golden bowl]
                    Real enough to buy a ship?
Jorah Mormont: Aye, a small ship.  [to the Dothraki]  Take all the
               gold and jewels!

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Morghulis [2.10], Season 2"
%
Tyrion Lannister: The badge looks good on you. Almost as good as it
                  looked on me.  [Tywin doesn't answer]  Are you
                  enjoying your new position?
Tywin Lannister: Am I enjoying it?
Tyrion Lannister: I was very happy as Hand of the King.
Tywin Lannister: Yes. I heard how happy you were. You brought a whore
                 into my bed.
Tyrion Lannister: It wasn't your bed at the time.
Tywin Lannister: I sent you here to advise the king. I gave you real
                 power and authority. You chose to spend your days as
                 you always have, bedding harlots and drinking with
                 thieves.
Tyrion Lannister: Occasionally I drank with the harlots.
Tywin Lannister: What do you want, Tyrion?
Tyrion Lannister: Why does everyone assume I want something? Can't I
                  simply visit with my beloved father? My beloved
                  father who somehow forgot to visit his wounded son
                  after he fell on the battlefield.
Tywin Lannister: Maester Pycelle assured me your wounds were not
                 fatal.
Tyrion Lannister: I organized the defense of this city while you held
                  court in the ruins of Harrenhal. I led the foray
                  when the enemies were at the gate while your
                  grandson, the king, quivered in fear behind the
                  walls. I bled in the mud for our family. And as my
                  reward, I was trundled off to some dark little cell.
                  But what do I want? A little bloody gratitude would
                  be a start.
Tywin Lannister: Jugglers and singers require applause. You are a
                 Lannister. Do you think I demanded a garland of roses
                 every time I suffered a wound on a battlefield? Hmm?
                 Now, I have seven kingdoms to look after and three of
                 them are in open rebellion. So tell me what you want.
Tyrion Lannister: I want what is mine by right. Jaime is your eldest
                  son, heir to your lands and titles. But he is a
                  Kingsguard, forbidden from marriage or inheritance.
                  The day Jaime put on the white cloak, he gave up his
                  claim to Casterly Rock. I am your son and lawful
                  heir.
Tywin Lannister: You want Casterly Rock?
Tyrion Lannister: It is mine by right.
Tywin Lannister: We'll find you accommodations more suited to your
                 name and as a reward for your accomplishments during
                 the battle of Blackwater Bay. And when the time is
                 right, you will be given a position fit for your
                 talents so that you can serve your family and protect
                 our legacy. And if you serve faithfully, you will be
                 rewarded with a suitable wife. And I would let myself
                 be consumed by maggots before mocking the family name
                 and making you heir to Casterly Rock.
Tyrion Lannister: Why?
Tywin Lannister: Why? You ask that? You, who killed your mother to
                 come into the world? You are an ill-made, spiteful
                 little creature full of envy, lust, and low cunning.
                 Men's laws give you the right to bear my name and
                 display my colors since I cannot prove that you are
                 not mine. And to teach me humility, the gods have
                 condemned me to watch you waddle about wearing that
                 proud lion that was my father's sigil and his
                 father's before him. But neither gods nor men will
                 ever compel me to let you turn Casterly Rock into
                 your whorehouse. Go, now. Speak no more of your
                 rights to Casterly Rock. Go.  [Tyrion walks away]
                 Oh, one more thing. The next whore I catch in your
                 bed I'll hang.

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Dohaeris [3.01], Season 3"
%
Davos Seaworth: Your Grace, you are the rightful king. Not only by
                blood. You're an honorable man, a just man. And there
                is still a war to fight.
Stannis Baratheon: I am fighting.
Davos Seaworth: By burning prisoners alive?
Melissandre: How would you punish the infidels, Ser Davos?
Davos Seaworth: I do not judge people for the gods they worship. If I
                did, I'd have thrown you in the sea before you ever
                set foot on Dragonstone.
Melissandre: I'm not your enemy.
Davos Seaworth: You are my enemy.
Melissandre: Was it me you fought on Blackwater Bay? Did I set your
             ships ablaze? I wasn't there when the wildfire killed our
             men by the thousands. I could have saved those men. You
             would have taken the city, Stannis would now sit upon his
             rightful throne, and you would stand beside him.  But I
             wasn't there  because you convinced your king to leave me
             behind. Do you hear them screaming? All those burning men
             in the water crying for their mothers, for their gods for
             help? Until the moment the Blackwater swallowed them.
             Don't despair, Ser Davos. What I told your son is true.
             Death by fire is the purest death.
[Davos pulls out a knife and tries to stab Melissandre, but is
restrained by the guards.

Davos Seaworth: This woman is evil! She's the mother of demons.
Stannis Baratheon: Take him to the dungeon and lock him in a cell.
Davos Seaworth: Your Grace!
Melissandre: You've chosen the darkness, Ser Davos.
Davos Seaworth   [to Stannis]  She will destroy us all!

Melissandre: I will pray for you.

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Dohaeris [3.01], Season 3"
%
Joffrey Baratheon: I do apologize, my lady. Small council meetings. At
                   what point does it become treason to waste the
                   king's time? That's a lovely gown, my lady.
Cersei Lannister: Yes, it suits you perfectly. I imagine you might be
                  rather cold.
Margaery Tyrell: The climate is a bit more forgiving back in
                 Highgarden, Your Grace.
Joffrey Baratheon: Shall I have them bring you a shawl, my lady?
Margaery Tyrell: I am touched by your concern, Your Grace. Luckily for
                 us Tyrells, our blood runs quite warm. Doesn't it,
                 Loras?
Loras Tyrell: Yes.
Margaery Tyrell: Loras, isn't the queen's gown magnificent? The
                 fabric, the embroidery, the metalwork. I've never
                 seen anything like it.
Cersei Lannister: You might find a bit of armor quite useful once you
                  become queen. Perhaps before. Joffrey tells me you
                  stopped your carriage at Flea Bottom on your way
                  back from the sept this morning.
Margaery Tyrell: Yes. I paid a visit to an orphanage the High Septon
                 told me about.
Loras Tyrell: Margaery does a great deal of work with the poor back in
              Highgarden. The lowest among us are no different from
              the highest if you give them a chance and approach them
              with an open heart.
Cersei Lannister: An open heart is what you'll get in Flea Bottom if
                  you're not careful, my dear. Not long ago, we were
                  attacked by a mob there. We had a full complement of
                  guards that didn't stop them. The king barely
                  escaped with his life.
Joffrey Baratheon: My mother's always had a penchant for drama. Facts
                   become less and less important to her as she grows
                   older. Our lives were never truly in danger.
Cersei Lannister: You're right, of course. But you are your father's
                  son. We can't all have a king's bravery.
Margaery Tyrell: Hunger turns men into beasts. I'm glad House Tyrell
                 has been able to help in this regard. They tell me
                 100 wagons arrive daily now from the Reach. Wheat,
                 barley, apples. We've had a blessed harvest. And, of
                 course, it's our duty to assist the capital in time
                 of need.
Joffrey Baratheon: Well, as Ser Loras said, Lady Margaery has done
                   this sort of... charitable work before. I'm sure
                   she knows what she's doing.
Cersei Lannister: I'm sure she does.

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Dohaeris [3.01], Season 3"
%
[ Missandei translates Kraznys, who cannot speak the Common Tongue,
explanation of Unsullied's training to Daenerys ]

Missandei: They begin their training at five. Every day they drill
           from dawn to dusk until they have mastered the shortsword,
           the shield, and the three spears. Only one boy in four
           survives this rigorous training. Their discipline and
           loyalty are absolute. They fear nothing.
Jorah Mormont: Even the bravest men fear death.
Missandei: [in High Valyrian]  The knight says even brave men fear
           death.
Kraznys mo Nakloz: [in High Valyrian]  Tell the old man he smells like
                   piss.
Missandei: [in High Valyrian]  Truly, Master?
Kraznys mo Nakloz: [in High Valyrian  No, not truly. Are you a girl or
                   a goat to ask such a thing?
Missandei: [in the Common Tongue]  My master says the Unsullied are
           not men. Death means nothing to them.
Kraznys mo Nakloz: in High Valyrian]  Tell this ignorant whore of a
                   Westerner to open her eyes and watch.
Missandei: He begs you attend to this carefully, Your Grace.
Daenerys Targaryen: Tell the good master there is no need.
Kraznys: [in High Valyrian]  She's worried about their nipples. Does
         the dumb bitch know we've cut off their balls?  [cuts off the
         nipple of one of the Unsullied, who doesn't even flinch]
Missandei: My master points out that men don't need nipples.
Kraznys: [in High Valyrian]  Here, I'm done with you.
Unsullied soldier: [in High Valyrian]  This one is pleased to have
                   served you.
Missandei: To win his shield, an Unsullied must go to the slave marts
           with a silver mark, find a newborn and kill it before its
           mother's eyes. This way, my master says, we make certain
           there is no weakness left in them.
Daenerys Targaryen: You take a babe from its mother's arms, kill it as
                    she watches, and pay for her pain with a silver
                    coin?
Missendei: [in High Valyrian]  She is offended. She asks if you pay a
           silver coin to the mother, for her dead baby.
Kraznys: [in High Valyrian]  What a soft mewling fool this one is.
Missandei: My master would like you to know that the silver is paid to
           the baby's owner, not the mother.
Daenerys Targaryen: How many do you have to sell?
[Kraznys holds up eight fingers]

Daenerys Targaryen: 8,000.
Kraznys: [in High Valyrian]  Tell the Westerosi whore she has until
         tomorrow.
Missandei: Master Kraznys asks that you please hurry. Many other
           buyers are interested.

	"Game of Thrones: Valar Dohaeris [3.01], Season 3"
%
Jaime Lannister: You know, it doesn't matter how loyal a servant you
                 are, no one enjoys the company of a humorless mute.
                 Trust me on this. People have been serving me since I
                 was born. You think Lady Stark is going to want a
                 giant towheaded plank following her around for the
                 rest of her life? A week's journey with you and
                 she'll order you to fall on your sword.
Brienne: If Lady Stark is unhappy with any aspect of my service, I'm
         sure she'll let me know. She's an honest woman.
Jaime Lannister: For all the good it's done her. How did you come into
                 Lady Stark's service? There's something we can talk
                 about.
Brienne: Not your concern, Kingslayer.
Jaime Lannister: It had to be recently. You weren't with her at
                 Winterfell.
Brienne: How would you know?
Jaime Lannister: Because I visited Winterfell. I would have noticed
                 your dour head smacking into the archways.
Brienne: Move.
Jaime Lannister: Were you pledged to Stannis?
Brienne: Gods, no.
Jaime Lannister: Ah, Renly. Really? He wasn't fit to rule over
                 anything more important than a 12-course meal.
Brienne: Shut your mouth.
Jaime Lannister: Why? I lived with him at court since he was a boy,
                 don't forget. Could hardly escape the little tulip
                 skipping down the corridors in his embroidered silks.
                 I knew him far better than you.
Brienne: I knew him as well as anyone. As a member of his Kingsguard,
         he trusted me with everything. He would have been a wonderful
         king.
Jaime Lannister: Sounds like you quite fancied him.
Brienne: I did not fancy him.
Jaime Lannister: Oh, gods, you did. Did you ever tell him? No, of
                 course not. You weren't Renly's type, I'm afraid. He
                 preferred curly-haired little girls like Loras
                 Tyrell. You're far too much man for him.
Brienne: I'm not interested in foul rumors.
Jaime Lannister: Unless they're about me. It's all true about Renly.
                 His proclivities were the worst kept secret at court.
                 It's a shame the throne isn't made out of cocks.
                 They'd have never got him off it.
Brienne: [ grabs Jaime by his hair ] Shut your mouth!
Jaime Lannister: I don't blame him. And I don't blame you, either. We
                 don't get to choose who we love.

	"Game of Thrones: Dark Wings, Dark Words [3.02], Season 3"
%
Margaery Tyrell: Lady Sansa, it is my honor to present my
                 grandmother... the Lady Olenna of House Tyrell.
Olenna Tyrell  Kiss me, child. [ Sansa does so ] It's so good of you
to visit me and my foolish flock of hens. We're very sorry for your
losses.

Sansa Stark: And I was sorry when I heard of Lord Renly's death, Lady
             Margaery. He was very gallant.
Olenna Tyrell: Gallant, yes. And charming and very clean. He knew how
               to dress and smile and somehow this gave him the notion
               he was fit to be king.
Margaery Tyrell: Renly was brave and gentle, Grandmother. Father liked
                 him and so did Loras.
Olenna Tyrell  Loras is young and very good at knocking men off horses
with a stick. That does not make him wise. As to your fathead father--

Margaery Tyrell: Grandmother! What will Sansa think of us?
Olenna Tyrell: She might think we have some wits about us. One of us,
               at any rate. It was treason. I warned them. Robert has
               two sons and Renly has an older brother. How could he
               possibly have any claim to that ugly iron chair? We
               should have stayed well out of all this if you ask me.
               But once the cow's been milked, there's no squirting
               the cream back up her udders. So here we are to see
               things through.

	"Game of Thrones: Dark Wings, Dark Words [3.02], Season 3"
%
Olenna Tyrell: Here, Sansa, come sit with me. I'm much less boring
               than these others. Do you know my son? The Lord of
               Highgarden?
Sansa Stark: I haven't had the pleasure.
Olenna Tyrell: No great pleasure, believe me. A ponderous oaf. His
               father was an oaf as well. My husband, the late Lord
               Luthor. He managed to ride off a cliff whilst hawking.
               They say he was looking up at the sky and paying no
               mind to where his horse was taking him. And now my son
               is doing the same, only this time he's riding a lion
               instead of a horse. Now... I want you to tell me the
               truth about this royal boy, this Joffrey.
Sansa Stark: I... I...
Olenna Tyrell: You, you. Who else would know better? We've heard some
               troubling tales. Is there any truth to them? Has this
               boy mistreated you? [ Sansa remains silent ] Has he
               ripped out your tongue?
Sansa Stark: Joff- King Joffrey, he-- His Grace is very fair and
             handsome and as brave as a lion.
Olenna Tyrell: Yes, all Lannisters are lions. And when a Tyrell farts,
               it smells like a rose. But how kind is he? How clever?
               Has he a good heart, a gentle hand?
Margaery Tyrell: I'm to be his wife. I only want to know what that
                 means.
Olenna Tyrell: [ to a servant ] Bring me some cheese.
Servant: The cheese will be served after the cakes, my lady.
Olenna Tyrell: The cheese will be served when I want it served. And I
               want it served now. [ to Sansa ] Are you frightened,
               child? No need for that. We're only women here. Tell us
               the truth. No harm will come to you.
Sansa Stark: My father always told the truth.
Olenna Tyrell: Yes, he had that reputation. And they named him traitor
               and took his head.
Sansa Stark: Joffrey. Joffrey did that. He promised he would be
             merciful and he cut my father's head off. And he said
             that was mercy. Then he took me up on the walls and made
             me look at it.
Margaery Tyrell: Go on.
Sansa Stark: I- I can't. I never meant- my father was a traitor. My
             brother as well. I have traitor's blood. Please don't
             make me say anymore.
Margaery Tyrell: She's terrified, Grandmother. Just look at her.
Olenna Tyrell: Speak freely, child. We would never betray your
               confidence, I swear it.
Sansa Stark: He's a monster.
Olenna Tyrell: Ah. That's a pity.
Sansa Stark: Please, don't stop the wedding.
Olenna Tyrell: Have no fear. The Lord Oaf of Highgarden is determined
               that Margaery shall be queen. Even so, we thank you for
               the truth. Ah, here comes my cheese.

	"Game of Thrones: Dark Wings, Dark Words [3.02], Season 3"
%
Queen Talisa: [observing the prayer wheel Catelyn is making]  May I
              help you, Lady Stark?
Catelyn Stark: [sharply]  No.
Queen Talisa: I'm sorry, I shouldn't have-
Catelyn Stark: You can't help because a mother makes one for her
               children to protect them. Only a mother can make them.
Queen Talisa: You've made them before?
Catelyn Stark: Twice.
Queen Talisa: Did they work?
Catelyn Stark: After a fashion. I prayed for my son Bran to survive
               his fall. Many years before that, one of the boys came
               down with the pox. Maester Luwin said if he made it
               through the night, he'd live. But it would be a very
               long night. So I sat with him all through the darkness,
               listened to his ragged little breaths, his coughing,
               his whimpering.
Queen Talisa: Which boy?
Catelyn Stark: Jon Snow . When my husband brought that baby home from
               the war, I couldn't bear to look at him, didn't want to
               see those brown stranger's eyes staring at me. So I
               prayed to the gods "Take him away, make him die". He
               got the pox and I knew I was the worst woman who ever
               lived. A murderer. I'd condemned this poor, innocent
               child to a horrible death all because I was jealous of
               his mother, a woman he didn't even know! So I prayed to
               all Seven Gods "Let the boy live. Let him live and I'll
               love him. I'll be a mother to him. I'll beg my husband
               to give him a  true  name, to call him Stark and be
               done with it, to make him one of us".
Queen Talisa: And he lived?
Catelyn Stark: And he lived. And I couldn't keep my promise. And
               everything that's happened since then, all this horror
               that's come to my family...it's all because I couldn't
               love a motherless child.

	"Game of Thrones: Dark Wings, Dark Words [3.02], Season 3"
%
Osha: Isn't he ashamed, your brother, needing you to protect him?
Meera Reed: Where's the shame in that?
Osha: Any boy his age who needs his sister to protect him is gonna
      find himself needing lots of protecting.
Meera Reed: Some people will always need help. That doesn't mean
            they're not worth helping.

	"Game of Thrones: Dark Wings, Dark Words [3.02], Season 3"
%
Edmure Tully: If I may, nephew, I encountered a situation with one of
              my lieutenants at the Stone Mill which may have some
              bearing-
Brynden Tully: Why don't you shut your mouth about that damned mill?
               And don't call him "nephew." He is your king.
Edmure Tully: Robb knows I meant him no disr-
Brynden Tully: You're lucky I'm not your king. I wouldn't let you wave
               your blunders around like a victory flag.
Edmure Tully: My blunder sent Tywin's mad dog scurrying back to
              Casterly Rock with his tail between his legs. I think
              King Robb understands we're not gonna win this war if
              he's the only one winning any battles. No, there's glory
              enough to go around.
Robb Stark: It's not about glory. Your instructions were to wait for
            him to come to you.
Edmure Tully: I seized an opportunity.
Robb Stark: What value was the mill?
Edmure Tully: The Mountain was garrisoned across the river from it.
Robb Stark: Is he there now?
Edmure Tully: Of course not. We took the fight to him. He could not
              withstand us.
Robb Stark: I wanted to draw the Mountain into the west, into our
            country where we could surround him and kill him. I wanted
            him to chase us, which he would have done because he is a
            mad dog without a strategic thought in his head. I could
            have that head on a spike by now. Instead, I have a mill.
Edmure Tully: We took hostages. Willem Lannister. Martyn Lannister.
Robb Stark: Willem and Martyn Lannister are 14 years old.
Brynden Tully :'Martyn is 15, I believe.
Robb Stark: Tywin Lannister has my sisters. Have I sued for peace?
Edmure Tully: No.
Robb Stark: Do you think he'll sue for peace because we have his,
            father's brother's great-grandsons?
Edmure Tully: No.
Robb Stark: How many men did you lose?
Edmure Tully: 208. But for every man we lost, the Lannisters--
Robb Stark: We need our men more than Tywin needs his!
Edmure Tully: I'm sorry. I didn't know.
Robb Stark: You would have. Right here today at this gathering if you
            had been patient.
Brynden Tully: We seem to be running short of patience here.
Robb Stark: You know who isn't? Tywin Lannister.

	"Game of Thrones: Walk of Punishment [3.03], Season 3"
%
[At a Small Council meeting]

Tywin Lannister: What news of Jaime?  [All the others remain silent]
                 Twenty thousand unwashed Northerners have known about
                 his escape for weeks. Collectively, you control more
                 spies and informants than the rest of the world
                 combined. Do you mean to tell me that none of you has
                 any notion where he is?
Varys: We are trying, my lord-
Tywin Lannister: Try harder ! What do we have then?
Varys: Robb Stark and most of his bannermen are in Riverrun for the
       funeral of his grandfather, Lord Hoster Tully. In Stark's
       absence, Roose Bolton holds Harrenhal... [Varys smirks at
       Littlefinger]  which would make him Lord of Harrenhal, in
       practice if not in name-
Tywin Lannister: Let him have it; the name suits our purposes far more
                 than that useless pile of rubble. The Lord of
                 Harrenhal will make a worthy suitor for the widow
                 Arryn.
Littlefinger: For which I am extremely grateful to you, my lord. Lady
              Arryn and I have known each other since we were
              children; she has always been...positively predisposed
              towards me.
Grand Maester Pycelle: A successful courtship would make Lord Baelish
                       Acting Lord of the Vale.
Littlefinger: Titles do seem to breed titles.
Tywin Lannister: You'll leave for the Eyrie as soon as possible and
                 bring Lysa Arryn into the fold, then the Young Wolf
                 can add his  own aunt  to the list of people who've
                 taken up arms against him!
Tyrion Lannister: Far be it from me to hinder true love, but Lord
                  Baelish's absence would present certain problems.
                  The royal wedding may end up being the most
                  expensive event in living memory. Summer had ended,
                  hard days lie ahead, not a good time to leave the
                  crown's finances unattended.
Tywin Lannister: Fully agreed, which is why I am naming  you  Master
                 of Coin.  [Cersei sniggers]
Tyrion Lannister: Master of Coin ?!
Tywin Lannister: It would appear to be a position that best suits
                 your...talents.
Tyrion Lannister: I'm quite good at spending money, but a lifetime of
                  outrageous wealth hasn't taught me about managing
                  it!
Cersei Lannister: [sarcastic]  I have  no doubt  you will prove equal
                  to this challenge.
Grand Maester Pycelle: [also sarcastic]  Hear, hear!

	"Game of Thrones: Walk of Punishment [3.03], Season 3"
%
[Melisandre is preparing to depart Dragonstone]

Stannis Baratheon: You refuse to tell me where you're going?
Melisandre: I don't know yet. The fires will show me.
Stannis Baratheon: How long will you be gone?
Melisandre: [exasperated]  I don't know!  [Stannis grabs her]
Stannis Baratheon: You're abandoning me!
Melisandre: I will  never  abandon you. You are the Son of Fire; I am
            sworn to serve you!
Stannis Baratheon: Then serve me now.
Melisandre: When I return you will understand.
Stannis Baratheon: My enemies think they've destroyed me. They're
                   laughing at me, the way Renly laughed at me. I want
                   Joffrey  dead . I want Robb Stark  dead . Make me
                   another 'son'.
Melisandre: I cannot.
Stannis Baratheon: Why ?!
Melisandre: You don't have the strength. It would kill you.
Stannis Baratheon: I'm not so easily killed; men have been trying for
                   years. I want  you .
Melisandre: Your fires burn low, my king.  [Stannis turns to leave]
            There is another way, a better way.
Stannis Baratheon: You told me your magic requires a king's blood.
Melisandre: Yes.
Stannis Baratheon: I am the one true king!
Melisandre: You are. But there are others with your blood in their
            veins. You  will  sit on the Iron Throne, but first there
            must be sacrifices. The Lord of Light demands it.

	"Game of Thrones: Walk of Punishment [3.03], Season 3"
%
[In Astapor]

Barristan Selmy: Leave this place, Your Grace. Leave tonight, I beg
                 you.
Jorah Mormont: And what is she to do for soldiers?
Barristan Selmy: We can find sellswords in Pentos and Myr.
Jorah Mormont: Is it  we  already, Ser Barristan? If you want to sit
               on the throne your ancestors built, you must win it.
               That will mean blood on your hands before the thing is
               done.
Daenerys Targaryen: The blood of my enemies, not the blood of
                    innocents.
Jorah Mormont: How many wars have you fought in, Ser Baristan?
Barristan Selmy: Three.
Jorah Mormont: Have you ever seen a war in which innocents didn't die
               by the thousands?  [Barristan remains silent, but
               shakes his head]  I was in King's Landing after the
               sack, Khaleesi. You know what I saw? Butchery. Babies,
               children, old men, more women raped than you can count.
               There's a beast in every man, and it stirs when you put
               a sword in his hand...but the Unsullied are  not  men.
               They do not rape, they do not put cities to the sword
               unless they're ordered to do so. If you buy them, the
               only men they'll kill are those you want dead.
               [Barristan scoffs]
Daenerys Targaryen: You disagree, Ser Barristan?
Barristan Selmy: When your brother Rhaegar led his army into battle at
                 the Trident, men died for him because they believed
                 in him, because they loved him, not because they'd
                 been bought at a slaver's auction. I fought beside
                 the last dragon on that day, your Grace. I bled
                 beside him.
Jorah Mormont: Rhaegar fought valiantly, Rhaegar fought nobly...and
               Rhaegar  died .
Daenerys Targaryen: Did you know him well, Ser Barristan?
Barristan Selmy: I did, your Grace. The finest man I ever met.
Daenerys Targaryen: I wish I had known him...but he  was not  the last
                    dragon.

	"Game of Thrones: Walk of Punishment [3.03], Season 3"
%
[Tyrion is going through Littlefinger's books of commerce]

Tyrion Lannister: For years, I've heard Littlefinger is a magician.
                  Whenever the Crown needs money, he rubs his hands
                  together and poof! Mountains of gold.
Bronn: Let me guess; he's not a magician?
Tyrion Lannister: No.
Bronn: He's stealing it?
Tyrion Lannister: Worse; he's borrowing it.
Bronn: What's wrong with that?
Tyrion Lannister: We can't afford to pay it back, that's what wrong
                  with it! The crown owes millions to my father.
Bronn: Seeing as it's his grandson's arse on the throne, I imagine
       he'll forgive that.
Tyrion Lannister: Forgive a debt? My father? For a man of the world,
                  you're strangely naive.
Bronn: I've never borrowed money before. I'm not clear on the rules.
Tyrion Lannister: Well...the basic principle is 'I lend you money, and
                  after an agreed upon period of time, you return
                  it...with interest'.
Bronn: And what if I don't?
Tyrion Lannister: Well, you have to.
Bronn: Well, what if I don't?
Tyrion Lannister: This is why I don't lend you money. Anyway, it's not
                  my father I'm worried about. It's the Iron Bank of
                  Braavos. We owe them tens of millions. If we fail to
                  repay these loans, the Bank will fund our enemies.
                  One way or another, they  always  get their gold
                  back.

	"Game of Thrones: Walk of Punishment [3.03], Season 3"
%
Locke: (holding a knife to Jaime's face)  You think you're the
       smartest man there is. Everyone alive has to bow to lick and
       scrape your boots.
Jaime: My father-
Locke: You get in any trouble, all you got to do is say "My father"
       and that's it. All your troubles are gone.  (Jaime grumbles)
       Have you got something to say?  (presses the knife to Jaime's
       eye)  You don't want to say the wrong thing. You're  nothing
       without your daddy, and your daddy ain't here.  (takes the
       knife away)  Never forget that.  (rises)  Here, this should
       help you remember!  (bring's the blade down, slicing Jaime's
       hand off)

	"Game of Thrones: Walk of Punishment [3.03], Season 3"
%
[Daenerys has just sold one of her dragons, Drogon, for an army of
8000 Unsullied]

Daenerys Targaryen: Is it done then? They belong to me?
Missandei: [translates Master Kraznys who only speaks Valyrian]  It is
           done. You hold the whip.
Master Kraznys: [in Valyrian]  The bitch has her army.
Daenerys Targaryen: Unsullied! Forward march!  [the Unsullied do so]
                    Halt!
Master Kraznys: [in Valyrian]  Tell the bitch her beast won't come.
Daenerys Targaryen: [in Valyrian]  A dragon is not a slave.
Master Kraznys: [in Valyrian]  You speak Valyrian?
Daenerys Targaryen: [in Valyrian]  I am Daenerys Stormborn of House
                    Targaryen, of the blood of Old Valyria. Valyrian
                    is my mother tongue.  [turns to the Unsullied]
                    Unsullied! Slay the masters, slay the soldiers,
                    slay every man who holds a whip, but harm no
                    child. Strike the chains of every slave you see!
                    [the Unsullied begin slaughtering the Astapori
                    slavers]
Master Kraznys: [in Valyrian]  I am your master. Kill her! Kill her!
Daenerys Targaryen: [in Valyrian]  Dracarys!
[Drogon breathes fire, burning Krasnyz]


	"Game of Thrones: And Now His Watch is Ended [3.04], Season 3"
%
Robb Stark: It took five of you to murder two unarmed squires?
Rickard Karstark: Not murder, Your Grace. Vengeance.
Robb Stark: Vengeance? Those boys didn't kill your sons. I saw Harrion
            die on the battlefield and Torrhen-
Rickard Karstark: Was strangled by the Kingslayer. They were his kin.
Robb Stark: [ furious ] THEY WERE BOYS! Look at them.
Rickard Karstark: Tell your mother to look at them. She killed them as
                  much as I.
Robb Stark: My mother had nothing to do with this. This was your
            treason.
Rickard Karstark: It's treason to free your enemies. In war, you kill
                  your enemies. Did your father not teach you that,
                  boy?
[ Brynden Tully punches Karstark in the face ]

Robb Stark: Leave him.
Rickard Karstark: Aye. Leave me to the king. He wants to give me a
                  scolding before he sets me free. That's how he deals
                  with treason. Our King in the North. Or should I
                  call him the King Who Lost the North?
Robb Stark: Escort Lord Karstark to the dungeon. Hang the rest.
Karstark soldier: Mercy, sire! I didn't kill anyone. I only watched
                  for the guards.
Robb Stark: This one was only the watcher. Hang him last so he can
            watch the others die.

	"Game of Thrones: Kissed By Fire [3.05], Season 3"
%
Jaime Lannister: [ steps into a bath with Brienne ] If I faint, pull
                 me out. I don't intend to be the first Lannister to
                 die in a bathtub.
Brienne of Tarth: Why should I care how you die?
Jaime Lannister: You swore a solemn vow, remember? You're supposed to
                 get me to King's Landing in one piece. [ nods to his
                 severed hand ] Not going so well, is it? No wonder
                 Renly died with you guarding him- [ Brienne rises
                 from the bath in anger]  That was unworthy. Forgive
                 me. You protected me better than most-
Brienne of Tarth: Don't you mock me.
Jaime Lannister: I'm apologizing. I'm sick of fighting. Let's call a
                 truce.
Brienne of Tarth: [ sinks back into the bath ] You need trust to have
                  a truce.
Jaime Lannister: I trust you. [ sees Brienne staring ] There it is.
                 There's the look. I've seen it for 17 years on face
                 after face. You all despise me. Kingslayer.
                 Oathbreaker. A man without honor. You've heard of
                 wildfire?
Brienne of Tarth: Of course.
Jaime Lannister: The Mad King was obsessed with it. He loved to watch
                 people burn, the way their skin blackened and
                 blistered and melted off their bones. He burned lords
                 he didn't like. He burned Hands who disobeyed him. He
                 burned anyone who was against him. Before long, half
                 the country was against him. Aerys saw traitors
                 everywhere. So he had his pyromancer place caches of
                 wildfire all over the city. beneath the Sept of
                 Baelor and the slums of Flea Bottom. Under houses,
                 stables, taverns. Even beneath the Red Keep itself.
                 Finally, the day of reckoning came. Robert Baratheon
                 marched on the capital after his victory at the
                 Trident. But my father arrived first with the whole
                 Lannister army at his back, promising to defend the
                 city against the rebels. I knew my father better than
                 that. He's never been one to pick the losing side. I
                 told the Mad King as much. I urged him to surrender
                 peacefully. But the king didn't listen to me. He
                 didn't listen to Varys who tried to warn him. But he
                 did listen to Grand Maester Pycelle, that grey,
                 sunken cunt. "You can trust the Lannisters," he said.
                 "The Lannisters have always been true friends of the
                 crown." So we opened the gates and my father sacked
                 the city. Once again, I came to the king, begging him
                 to surrender. He told me to... bring him my father's
                 head. Then he... turned to his pyromancer. "Burn them
                 all," he said. "Burn them in their homes. Burn them
                 in their beds." Tell me, if your precious Renly
                 commanded you to kill your own father and stand by
                 while thousands of men, women, and children burned
                 alive, would you have done it? Would you have kept
                 your oath then?  [Brienne stares at him in stunned
                 silence]  First, I killed the pyromancer. And then
                 when the king turned to flee, I drove my sword into
                 his back. "Burn them all," he kept saying. "Burn them
                 all." I don't think he expected to die. He- he meant
                 to... burn with the rest of us and rise again, reborn
                 as a dragon to turn his enemies to ash. I slit his
                 throat to make sure that didn't happen. That's where
                 Ned Stark found me.
Brienne of Tarth: If this is true... why didn't you tell anyone? Why
                  didn't you tell Lord Stark?
Jaime Lannister: Stark? You think the honorable Ned Stark wanted to
                 hear my side? He judged me guilty the moment he set
                 eyes on me. By what right does the wolf judge the
                 lion? By what right!? [ collapses ]
Brienne of Tarth: Help! Help! The Kingslayer!
Jaime Lannister: Jaime. My name is Jaime.

	"Game of Thrones: Kissed By Fire [3.05], Season 3"
%
Tywin Lannister: Your sister has learned that your new friends the
                 Tyrells are plotting to marry Sansa Stark to Sir
                 Loras.
Tyrion Lannister: Very well. She's a lovely girl. Missing some of
                  Loras' favorite bits, but I'm sure they'll make do.
Tywin Lannister: Your jokes are not appreciated.
Tyrion Lannister: It wasn't my best, but--
Tywin Lannister: I bring them into the royal fold and this is how they
                 repay me, by trying to steal the key to the North out
                 from under me.
Tyrion Lannister: Sansa is the key to the North? I seem to remember
                  she has an older brother.
Tywin Lannister: The Karstarks have marched home. The Young Wolf has
                 lost half his army. His days are numbered. Theon
                 Greyjoy murdered both his brothers. That makes Sansa
                 Stark the heir to Winterfell. And I am not about to
                 hand her over to the Tyrells.
Tyrion Lannister: The Tyrell army is helping us to win this war. Do
                  you really think it's wise to refuse them?
Tywin Lannister: There's nothing to refuse. This is a plot. Plots are
                 not public knowledge. And the Tyrells won't carry
                 this one out until after Joffrey's wedding. We need
                 to act first and kill this union in its crib.
Tyrion Lannister: And how do we do that?
Tywin Lannister: We find Sansa Stark a different husband.
Tyrion Lannister: Wonderful.
Cersei Lanniser: [ smiling ] Yes, it is.
Tyrion Lannister: [ after a long silence ] You can't mean it.
Tywin Lannister: I can and I do.
Tyrion Lannister: Joffrey has made this poor girl's life miserable
                  since the day he took her father's head. Now she's
                  finally free of him and you give her to me? That's
                  cruel  even for you.
Tywin Lannister: Do you intend on mistreating her? The girl's
                 happiness is not my concern, nor should it be yours.
Tyrion Lannister: She's a child!
Cersei Lannister: She's flowered, I assure you. She and I have
                  discussed it at length.
Tywin Lannister: There, you see? You will wed her, bed her, and put a
                 child in her. Surely you're capable of that.
Tyrion Lannister: And if I refuse?
Tywin Lannister: You wanted to be rewarded for your valor in battle.
                 Sansa Stark is a finer reward than you could ever
                 dare hope for. And it is past time you were wed.
Tyrion Lannister: [ furious  ] I  was  wed. Or don't you remember?
Tywin Lannister: Only too well.
Cersei Lannister: You should be thanking the gods for this. This is
                  more than you deserve.
Tywin Lannister: Tyrion will do as he's bid. As will you.
Cersei Lannister: What do you mean?
Tywin Lannister: You'll marry Ser Loras.
Cersee Lannister: I will not.
Tywin Lannister: The boy is heir to Highgarden. Tyrion will secure the
                 North, you will secure the Reach.
Cersei Lannnister: No, I won't do it.
Tywin Lannister: Yes, you will. You're still fertile. You need to
                 marry again and breed.
Cersei Lannister: [ furious ] I am Queen Regent, not some broodmare!
Tywin Lannister: [ shouting ]  You're my daughter!  You will do as I
                 command and you will marry Loras Tyrell and put an
                 end to the disgusting rumors about you once and for
                 all.
Cersei Lannnister: Father, don't make me do it again, please.
Tywin Lannister: Not another word. [ rises from his seat ] My
                 children. You've disgraced the Lannister name for far
                 too long.

	"Game of Thrones: Kissed By Fire [3.05], Season 3"
%
Edmure Tully: the laws of gods and men are very clear: "No man may
              compel another man to marry."
Brynden Tully: The laws of my fist are about to compel your teeth!

	"Game of Thrones: The Climb [3.06], Season 3"
%
[ Littlefinger is sitting, staring at the Iron Throne ]

Varys: A thousand blades. Taken from the hands of Aegon's fallen
       enemies, forged in the fiery breath of Balerion the Dread.
Littlefinger: There aren't a thousand blades. There aren't even two
              hundred. I've counted.
Varys: Heh. I'm sure you have. Ugly old thing.
Littlefinger: Yet it has a certain... appeal.
Varys: The Lysa Arryn of chairs. Shame that you had to settle for your
       second choice.
Littlefinger: Early days, my friend. It is flattering, really, you
              feeling such dread at the prospect of me getting what I
              want.
Varys: Thwarting you has never been my primary ambition, I promise
       you... although who doesn't like to see their friends fail now
       and then.
Littlefinger: [ stepping down from the dais ] You're so right. For
              instance, when I thwarted your plan to give Sansa Stark
              to the Tyrells... if, I'm going to be honest, I did feel
              an unmistakeable sense of... enjoyment there. But your
              confidante, the one who fed you information about my
              plans, the one you swore to protect, you didn't bring
              her any enjoyment. And she didn't bring me any
              enjoyment. She was a bad investment on my part. Luckily,
              I have a friend who wanted to try something new.
              Something daring. And he was so grateful to me for
              providing this fresh experience.
Varys: [ angrily ] I did what I did for the good of the realm.
Littlefinger: The realm. Do you know what the realm is? It's the
              thousand blades of Aegon's enemies, a story we agreed to
              tell each other over and over 'till we forget that it's
              a lie.
Varys: But what do we have left once we abandon the lie? Chaos. A
       gaping pit waiting to swallow us all.
Littlefinger: Chaos... isn't a pit. Chaos is a ladder. Many who try to
              climb it fail and never get to try again. The fall
              breaks them. And some, who are given the chance to
              climb, they refuse. They cling to the realm. Or the
              gods. Or love. Illusions. Only the ladder is real. The
              climb is all there is.

	"Game of Thrones: The Climb [3.06], Season 3"
%
Missandei: Now comes the noble Razdal mo Eraz of that ancient and
           honorable house, master of men and speaker to savages, to
           offer terms of peace. [ to Razdal ] Noble lord, you are in
           the presence of Daenerys Stormborn of House Targaryen,
           Queen of the Andals and the First Men, Khaleesi of the
           Great Grass Sea, Breaker of Chains, and Mother of Dragons.
Daenerys Targaryen: [ to Razdal ] You may approach. Sit.
Missandei: Will the noble lord take refreshment?
Razdal: Ancient and glorious is Yunkai. Our empire was old before
        dragons stirred in old Valyria. Many an army has broken
        against our walls. You shall find no easy conquest here,
        khaleesi.
Daenerys Targaryen: Good. My Unsullied need practice. I was told to
                    blood them early.
Razdal: [ nods ] If blood is your desire, blood shall flow. But why?
        'Tis true you have committed savageries in Astapor. But the
        Yunkai are a forgiving and generous people. The wise masters
        of Yunkai have sent a gift for the silver queen. [ slaves
        bring in two chests of gold ] There is far more than this
        awaiting you on the deck of your ship.
Daenerys Targaryen: My ship?
Razdal: Yes, khaleesi. As I said, we are a generous people. You shall
        have as many ships as you require.
Daenerys Targaryen: And what do you ask in return?
Razdal: All we ask is that you make use of these ships. Sail them back
        to Westeros where you belong and leave us to conduct our
        affairs in peace.
Daenerys Targaryen: I have a gift for you as well. Your life.
Razdal: My life?
Daenerys Targaryen: And the lives of your wise masters. But I also
                    want something in return. You will release every
                    slave in Yunkai. Every man, woman, and child shall
                    be given as much food, clothing, and property as
                    they can carry as payment for their years of
                    servitude. Reject this gift, and I shall show you
                    no mercy.
Razdal: You are mad. We are not Astapor or Qarth. We are Yunkai and we
        have powerful friends. Friends who would take great pleasure
        in destroying you. Those who survive, we shall enslave once
        more. Perhaps we'll make a slave of you as well. [ One of
        Daenerys' dragons screeches ] You swore me safe conduct.
Daenerys Targaryen: I did, but my dragons made no promises. And you
                    threatened their mother.
Razdal: [ to his slaves ] Take the gold.
[Daenerys' dragons screech and the slaves back away]

Daenerys Targaryen: My gold. You gave it to me, remember? And I shall
                    put it to good use. You'd be wise to do the same
                    with my gift to you. Now get out. [ Razdal leaves
                    ]
Barristan Selmy: The Yunkish are a proud people. They will not bend.
Daenerys Targaryen: And what happens to things that don't bend?

	"Game of Thrones: The Bear and the Maiden Fair [3.07], Season 3"
%
Melissandre: Haven't you ever wondered where your strength came from?
             Your talent for fighting?
Gendry: I'm lowborn. As low as can be. My mother was a tavern wench.
Melissandre: Mine was a slave. So was I. Bought and sold, scourged and
             branded, until the Lord of Light reached down, took me in
             his hand and raised me up.
Gendry: I was born in Flea Bottom.
Melissandre: Your blood is noble.
Gendry: Are you saying my father, he was some lord or...
Melissandre: There. [ nods to the Red Keep ] Your father's house.
Gendry: I'm just a bastard.
Melissandre: The bastard of Robert of the House Baratheon, First of
             His Name, King of the Andals and the First Men. Why do
             you think the gold cloaks wanted you? There is power in a
             king's blood.

	"Game of Thrones: The Bear and the Maiden Fair [3.07], Season 3"
%
Brienne of Tarth: I thought you were gone.
Jaime Lannister: Tomorrow.
Brienne of Tarth: Have they told you what they plan to do with me?
Jaime Lannister: Lord Bolton's traveling tomorrow as well. He's going
                 to the Twins for Edmure Tully's wedding. You're to
                 remain here.
Brienne of Tarth: With Locke?
Jaime Lannister: I owe you a debt.
Brienne of Tarth: When Catelyn Stark released you, we both made a
                  promise to her. Now it's your promise. You gave your
                  word. Keep it and consider the debt paid.
Jaime Lannister: I will return the Stark girls to their mother. I
                 swear it.
Brienne of Tarth: Good-bye, Ser Jaime.

	"Game of Thrones: The Bear and the Maiden Fair [3.07], Season 3"
%
Joffrey Baratheon: [after threatening to rape Sansa]  Time for the
                   bedding ceremony!
Tyrion Lannister: There will be no bedding ceremony.
Joffrey: [leading Sansa by the hand]  Where's your respect for
         tradition, uncle?! Come, everyone! Pick her up, and carry her
         to her wedding bed! Get rid of her gown, she won't be needing
         it any longer!  [gesturing]  Ladies! Attend to my uncle, he's
         not heavy!
Tyrion Lannister: There will be no bedding ceremony.
Joffrey Baratheon: [annoyed]  There will if I command it!
[Tyrion angrily slams his dagger into the table, startling Joffrey,
and eliciting horrified silence from the wedding-goers]

Tyrion Lannister: [dripping with hate]  Then you'll be fucking your
                  own bride with a wooden cock!
[Lord Tywin, sensing danger, gets to his feet]

Joffrey: [shocked, and seething]   What did you say? ...  What...Did
         you.   SAY!?
Tywin Lannister: I believe we can dispense with the bedding ceremony,
                 Your Grace. I'm sure Tyrion did not mean to threaten
                 the king.
Tyrion Lannister: [laughs]  A bad joke, Your Grace. I envy your own
                  royal manhood. Mine is so small, my poor wife won't
                  even know I'm there.
Tywin Lannister: Your uncle is clearly quite drunk, Your Grace.

	"Game of Thrones: Second Sons, Season 3"
%
Tyrion Lannister: [heavily drunk]  I am the god of tits and wine! I
                  shall build a shrine to myself at the next brothel I
                  visit!

	"Game of Thrones: Second Sons, Season 3"
%
Margaery Tyrell: [to Cersei, as they prepare for the wedding]  You
                 look radiant, your Grace.
Cersei Lannister: Radiant? Why radiant?
Margaery Tyrell: It's word that came to mind.  [Cersei smiles, though
                 falsely, and Margaery takes her arm]  We're going to
                 be sisters soon, we should be friends.
Cersei Lannister: You're a musical girl, aren't you? I imagine you
                  have a lovely voice.
Margaery Tyrell: A better dancer, than a singer, I'm afraid.
Cersei Lannister: Ah, but you know the song, the Rains of Castamere?
Margaery Tyrell: Of course. They play it so often here at court.
Cersei Lannister: So you know the story of House Reyne of Castamere?
Margaery Tyrell: Not as well as you, I'm sure.
Cersei Lannister: House Reyne was a powerful family. Very wealthy.
                  Second wealthiest in Westeros. Aren't the Tyrells
                  the second wealthiest family in Westeros now? Of
                  course, ambitious climbers don't want to stop on the
                  second highest rung. If only you could take that
                  final step. You'd see further than all the rest.
                  You'd be alone with nothing but blue sky above you.
                  So Lord Reyne built a castle, as grand as Casterly
                  Rock. He gave his wife diamonds, larger than any my
                  mother ever wore. And finally, one day, he rebelled
                  against my father. Do you know where House Reyne is
                  now?
Margaery Tyrell: Gone?
Cersei Lannister: Gone.  [adopting a more menacing tone]  A gentle
                  word. Why not say slaughtered? Every man, woman and
                  child, put to the sword. I remember seeing their
                  bodies hanging high above the gates of Casterly
                  Rock. My father let them rot up there all summer. It
                  was a long summer.  [Quoting "Rains of Castamere]
                  And now the Reynes weep o'er their halls, and not a
                  soul to hear."  [Takes Margaery's hand, looks into
                  her eyes, and speaks in a cold tone]  If you ever
                  call me "sister" again, I'll have you strangled in
                  your sleep.

	"Game of Thrones: Second Sons, Season 3"
%
Arya Stark :I know a killer. A real killer.
The Hound :That so?
Arya Stark :You’d be like a kitten to him. He’d kill you with his
             little finger.
The Hound :That him?
Arya Stark :...No.
The Hound :Good.

	"Game of Thrones: The Rains of Castamere [3.09], Season 3"
%
Walder Frey: [To Robb]  Your Grace, I fear I've been, remiss in my
             duties. I've given you meat and wine and music, but, I
             haven't shown you the hospitality you deserve. My king
             has married and I owe my new queen a wedding gift.
             [Catelyn notices Roose Bolton is wearing mail, and slaps
             him]
Catelyn: Robb!  [Turns just as Lothar Frey attacks Talisa, and the
         other Freys proceed to attack the northmen]

	"Game of Thrones: The Rains of Castamere [3.09], Season 3"
%
Walder Frey: The King in the North arises!

	"Game of Thrones: The Rains of Castamere [3.09], Season 3"
%
Catelyn Stark: [ Holding a knife to Jeyhousse's throat ] Lord Walder!
               Lord Walder,  enough!  ' Let it end!  Please... He is
               my son, my first son! Let him go and I swear we will
               forget this, I swear it by the old gods and the new, we
               will take no vengeance!
Walder Frey: You already swore me one oath, right here in this castle.
             You swore by all the gods that your son would marry my
             daughter!
Catelyn Stark: Take me for a hostage! But let Robb go. [ Turning to
               Robb, who is holding Talisa's body on the ground ] Robb
               get up, get up and walk out, please! Please!
Walder Frey: And why would I let him do that?
Catelyn Stark: [ Turning back to Walder Frey ] On my honor as a Tully,
               On my honor as a Stark! Let Robb go, or I will cut your
               wife's throat!
Walder Frey: [ Shrugs ] I'll find another.
Robb Stark: [ Stands up weakly ] Mother...
Roose Bolton: [ Walks up to Robb and holds him on the shoulder ] The
              Lannisters send their regards.

	"Game of Thrones: The Rains of Castamere [3.09], Season 3"
%
Tyrion Lannister: [ reading a note ] "Roslin caught a fine fat trout.
                  Her brothers gave her a pair of wolf pelts for her
                  wedding. Signed Walder Frey." Is that bad poetry or
                  is it supposed to mean something?
Joffrey Baratheon: [ gleefully ] Robb Stark is  dead!  And his bitch
                   mother! [ to Pycelle ] Write back to Lord
                   Frey.Thank him for his service and command him to
                   send Robb Stark's head. I'm going to serve it to
                   Sansa at my wedding feast.
Varys: Your Grace, Lady Sansa is your aunt by marriage.
Cersei Lannister: A joke. Joffrey did not mean it.
Joffrey Baratheon: Yes, I did. I'm going to have it served to Sansa at
                   my wedding feast.
Tyrion Lannister: No. She is no longer yours to torment.
Joffrey Baratheon :Everyone is mine to torment. You'd do well to
                    remember that, you little monster.
Tyrion Lannister: Oh, I'm a monster?! Perhaps you should speak to me
                  more softly, then. Monsters are dangerous and just
                  now kings are dying like flies.
Joffrey Baratheon: I could have your tongue out for saying that.
Cersei Lannister: Let him make his threats. Hmm? He's a bitter little
                  man.
Pycelle: Lord Tyrion should apologize immediately. Unacceptable,
         disrespectful, and in very bad taste.
Joffrey Baratheon: I am the king! I will punish you.
Tywin Lannister: Any man who must say, "I am the king" is no true
                 king. I'll make sure you understand that when I've
                 won your war for you.
Joffrey Baratheon: My father won the real war. He killed Prince
                   Rhaegar. He took the crown while you hid under
                   Casterly Rock!
Tywin Lannister: [ after a long silence ] The king is tired. See him
                 to his chambers.
Cersie Lannister: Come along.
Joffrey Baratheon: I'm not tired.
Cersei Lannister: We have so much to celebrate. A wedding to plan. You
                  must rest.
Tywin Lannister: Grand Maester, perhaps some essence of nightshade to
                 help him sleep.
Joffrey Baratheon: I'm not tired! [ leaves, followed by everyone
                   except Tywin ]
Tywin Lannister: [To Tyrion]  Not you.
Tyrion Lannister: [ with grudging admiration ] You just sent the most
                  powerful man in Westeros to bed without any supper.
Tywin Lannister: You're a fool if you believe he's the most powerful
                 man in Westeros.
Tyrion Lannister: [ sarcastically ] A treasonous statement! Joffrey is
                  king.
Tywin Lannister: You really think a crown gives you power?
Tyrion Lannister: No, I think armies give you power. Robb Stark had
                  one, never lost a battle, and you defeated him all
                  the same. [ Tywin nods ] Oh, I know. Walder Frey
                  gets all the credit, or the blame, I suppose,
                  depending on your allegiance.  [pause]  Walder Frey
                  is many things, but a brave man? No. He never would
                  have risked such an action, unless he had certain
                  assurances...
Tywin Lannister: Which he got from me. Do you disapprove?
Tyrion Lannister: I'm all for cheating, this is war. But to slaughter
                  them at a  wedding ...
Tywin Lannister: Explain to me why it is more noble to kill ten
                 thousand men in battle than a dozen at dinner.

	"Game of Thrones: Mhysa [3.10], Season 3"
%
[At the Twins, in the great hall, servants clean up the aftermath of
the Red Wedding]

Walder Frey: "The late Walder Frey" old Tully called me because I
             didn't get my men to the Trident in time for battle. He
             thought he was witty...but look at us now, Tully! You're
             dead, your daughter's dead, your grandson's dead, your
             son spent his wedding night in a dungeon and  I  am Lord
             of Riverrun!  [cackles]
Roose Bolton: The Blackfish escaped.
Walder Frey: An old man on the run with no allies. I have Tywin
             Lannister backing me, who does he have?!
Roose Bolton: [unconvinced]  As you say.
Walder Frey: They all laughed at me, all those high lords, they all
             thought they were better than me: Ned Stark, Hoster
             Tully...people snigger when  I  marry a young girl, but
             who said a word when Jon Arryn married the little Tully
             bitch?!
Roose Bolton: You'll be needing a new young girl.
Walder Frey: Yes...got that to look forward to. And  you ...the Warden
             of the North! No more Starks to bow and scrape to! Must
             have been torture following that stupid boy all over the
             country.
Roose Bolton: He ignored my advice at every turn. If he'd been a
              trifle less arrogant...
Walder Frey: Calling himself "The Young Wolf"...how's that for
             pomposity?! Well... [raises his goblet in mock toast]
             Here's to the Young Wolf!  [makes a mocking wolf howl]
Roose Bolton: Forever young.  [both men chuckle]
Walder Frey: Will you move to Winterfell now that the war's over?
Roose Bolton: At some point, perhaps. But Winterfell's in ruins.
Walder Frey: Yes...what happened up there? I heard the Greyjoy boy
             seized the place. I heard he killed all the ravens and
             then, nothing.
Roose Bolton: I sent my bastard Ramsay to root him out. Robb Stark
              offered amnesty for the ironborn amnesty if they gave us
              Theon.
Walder Frey: And?
Roose Bolton: [grins]  Ramsay delivered the terms. The ironborn turned
              on Theon as we knew they would. They handed him over,
              trussed and hooded, but Ramsay...well, Ramsay has his
              own way of doing things.

	"Game of Thrones: Mhysa [3.10], Season 3"
%
Lord Varys: [to Shae]  When did you come to this strange country?
Shae: When I was thirteen.
Varys: You were only a child?
Shae: I stopped being a child when I was nine. My mother made sure of
      that.
Varys: You've been a good influence on our mutual friend, you know.
       [Shae permits herself a smile]  He used to drink from sun-down
       to sun-up, visit three brothels a night, gamble away his
       father's money. Now it's just the drinking.
Shae: [bitterly]  And now I'm his wife's servant. I brush her hair and
      clip her nails and empty her chamber pot.
Varys: She is a sweet young thing. None of this is her fault.
Shae: [suddenly angry]  I love that girl. I would kill for her. Do you
      think that makes it easier for me?

	"Game of Thrones: Mhysa [3.10], Season 3"
%
Balon Greyjoy: [ reading a letter ] "Balon Greyjoy, Lord of the Iron
               Islands and invader of the North. I give you until the
               full moon to order all ironborn scum out of the North
               and back to those shit-stained rocks you call a home.
               On the first night of the full moon, I will hunt down
               every islander still in our lands and flay them living
               the way I flayed the 20 ironborn scum I found at
               Winterfell. In the box you'll find a special gift:
               Theon's favorite toy. He cried when I took it away from
               him."
Balon stops reading and looks into the box, containing Theon's cock

Balon Greyjoy: "Leave the North now or more boxes will follow with
               more Theon. Signed Ramsay Snow, natural-born son of
               Roose Bolton, Lord of the Dreadfort and Warden of the
               North." [ to Yara ] Get that out of my sight.
[Yara stares at him is disbelief]

Balon Greyjoy: Theon disobeyed my orders. The boy is a fool. [ looks
               at the box ] He cannot further the Greyjoy line. I will
               not give up the lands I have seized, the strongholds I
               have taken. Get this away from me.
Yara Greyjoy: He's your son.
Balon Greyjoy: Son? He's not a man anymore.
Yara Greyjoy: He's your son. He's my brother. He's a Greyjoy.
Balon Greyjoy: Watch yourself. I've made my decision.
Yara Greyjoy: And I've made mine. I'm going to pick the fastest ship
              in our fleet. I'm going to choose the 50 best killers on
              the Iron Islands. I'm going to sail up the Narrow Sea
              all the way to the Weeping Water. I'm going to march on
              the Dreadfort. I'm going to find my little brother and
              I'm going to bring him home.

	"Game of Thrones: Mhysa [3.10], Season 3"
%
Samwell Tarly: I know how this must look. [ realises Aemon is blind ]
               What I meant was-
Gilly: I swear to you, my lord--
Maester Aemon: I'm not a lord, my dear. Not for many, many years.
               Every man who joins the Night's Watch renounces all
               former titles. Among other things. What is your name?
Gilly: Gilly.
Maester Aemon: Ah, for the gillyflower. Lovely.
Gilly: Yes, my-
Samwell Tarly: Maester.
Gilly: Master.
Samwell Tarly: Maester.
Maester Aemon: And the child?
Samwell Tarly: She hasn't chosen a name yet.
Gilly: His name is Sam.
Maester Aemon: Tarly... do you remember the oath you swore when you
               joined this order?
Samwell Tarly: He's not my child, Maester Aemon. She's one of
               Craster's wives. I remember every word of the oath.
               Night gathers and my watch begins. I am the shield that
               guards the realms of men. The realms of men. That means
               her as well as us. We didn't build 500 miles of ice
               walls 700 feet high to keep out men. The night is
               gathering, Maester Aemon. I've seen it. It's coming for
               all of us.
Maester Aemon: Gilly, you and your son will be our guests for the time
               being. We certainly cannot send you back beyond the
               Wall.
Gilly: Thank you... Maester. I can cook and clean and I can-
Maester Aemon: Good. Samwell, fetch a quill and inkwell. I hope your
               penmanship is better than your swordplay.
Samwell Tarly: Miles better.
Maester Aemon: We had 44 ravens at last count. Make sure they're all
               fed. Every one of them flies tonight.

	"Game of Thrones: Mhysa [3.10], Season 3"
%
